S.  714,  THE  JUNK  FAX  PREVENTION  ACT  OF 

2005

S.  HRG.  109–278

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TRADE, TOURISM, AND 

ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

OF THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

APRIL  13,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

25–874 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  TRADE,  TOURISM,  AND  ECONOMIC  DEVELOPMENT 

GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota,  Ranking 
DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 13, 2005 ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Boxer ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Bladine, Jon E., President/Publisher, News-Register Publishing Company .......
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Feeken,  Dave,  Broker,  RE/MAX;  on  behalf  of  the  National  Association  of 
REALTORS  (NAR) ............................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Kirsch, Steven T., Founder/Chairman, Propel Software Corporation .................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

Page 
1
2
4
1

5
7

11
13
19
21

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

S.  714,  THE  JUNK  FAX  PREVENTION  ACT  OF 

2005

WEDNESDAY,  APRIL  13,  2005

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TRADE, TOURISM, AND ECONOMIC 
DEVELOPMENT, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:45  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Gordon  H.  Smith, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH,

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator  SMITH.  We’ll  call  to  order  this  hearing  of  the  Trade, 
Tourism,  and  Economic  Development  Subcommittee  of  the  full 
Commerce  Committee.  The  hearing  is  on  S.  714,  The  Junk  Fax 
Prevention Act of 2005. I apologize to those present that we’ve had 
votes get in the way of our starting at 2:30, but let’s begin. 

I  thank  the  witnesses  for  being  here  today.  Today’s  hearing  will 
focus  on  The  Junk  Fax  Prevention  Act  of  2005.  I  thank  my  col-
leagues  on  the  Senate  Commerce  Committee,  Senators  Inouye, 
Burns,  Stevens,  Dorgan,  Lautenberg,  Snowe,  and  Sununu,  a  broad 
bipartisan coalition, for co-sponsoring this legislation with me. 

S. 714 would create a statutory exemption to the current commu-
nications  law  prohibiting  the  faxing  of  unsolicited  advertisements 
to  individuals  without  their  prior  written  invitation  or  permission. 
This bill would not legalize the sending of junk faxes or blast faxes, 
which  have  been  prohibited  for  13  years  and  will  continue  to  be 
prohibited  under  this  bill.  This  bill  is  about  continuing  legitimate 
fax communications between businesses and customers. 

S.  714  will  strengthen  existing  laws  by  providing  consumers  the 
ability to prevent unsolicited fax advertisements and provide great-
er  congressional  oversight  of  enforcement  efforts  by  the  Federal 
Communications Commission. This bill will also help businesses by 
allowing  them  to  continue  to  send  faxes  to  their  customers  in  a 
manner  that  has  proven  successful  with  both  businesses  and  con-
sumers. 

In  July  of  2003,  the  FCC  reconsidered  its  Telephone  Consumer 
Protection  Act  rules,  and  elected  to  eliminate  the  ability  for  busi-
nesses to contact their customers even where there exists an estab-
lished  business  relationship.  The  effect  of  the  FCC  rule  would  be 
to  prevent  a  business  from  sending  a  fax,  fax  solicitation,  to  any 
person, whether it is a supplier or a customer, without first obtain-

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

2

ing prior written consent. This approach, while seemingly sensible, 
would  impose  significant  costs  on  businesses  in  the  form  of  exten-
sive recordkeeping. 

Recognizing  the  problems  created  by  this  rule,  the  Commission 
has twice delayed the effective date of its implementation, with the 
current extension of its stay expiring on June 30, 2005. 

The  purpose  of  this  legislation  is  to  preserve  the  established 
business  relationship  exemption  currently  recognized  under  TCPA. 
In  addition,  this  bill  will  allow  consumers  to  opt  out  of  receiving 
further  unsolicited  faxes.  This  is  a  new  consumer  protection  that 
does not exist under the TCPA today. 

We  believe  that  this  bipartisan  bill  strikes  the  appropriate  bal-
ance  in  providing  significant  protections  to  consumers  from  un-
wanted,  unsolicited  fax  advertisements,  and  preserves  the  many 
benefits that result from legitimate fax communications. 

We  have  heard  from  hundreds  of  associations,  representing  tens 
of  thousands  of  large  and  small  businesses,  on  the  importance  of 
swiftly  passing  this  legislation  to  avoid  interfering  with  legitimate 
communications.  In  the  108th  Congress,  this  legislation  passed 
both  the  Senate  and  the  House,  but  was  not  signed  into  law  prior 
to adjournment of Congress. We hope that both the Senate and the 
House  can  pass  S.  714  in  a  timely  manner  prior  to  June  30,  2005, 
when the FCC stay expires. 

I  want  to  publicly  welcome  and  thank  one  of  my  constituents, 
Mr.  Jeb  Bladine,  the  publisher  and  editor  of  the  News-Register,  in 
McMinnville, Oregon, who is here to testify about how this bill will 
affect small businesses like him. 

I’m  pleased  to  be  joined  by  my  colleague  and  my  neighbor  from 
California,  Senator  Barbara  Boxer,  who  has  a  slightly  different 
view of this bill, I think. 

STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA BOXER,

U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 

Senator  BOXER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  so  very  much.  And, 
Senator  Smith,  thank  you  for  the  cooperative  manner  in  which  we 
have worked since the last session on this legislation. 

I expressed my objections then, and I was able to negotiate great-
er protections for consumers in the final bill that passed the Senate 
on  December  8,  2004.  A  lot  of  it  had  to  do  with  the  fact  that  you 
were  willing  to  work  with  me,  and  I  so  appreciate  it  now.  These 
improvements  included  important  protections  for  consumers,  as 
well  as  for  small  business;  however,  S.  714,  the  legislation  before 
us  today,  includes  none  of  these  protections  and  is  a  huge  step 
backwards. This is clear to me that, instead of a Junk Fax Preven-
tion Act, which is its title, I think it should be called The Junk Fax 
Promotion  Act,  because,  at  the  end  of  the  day,  that’s  what  we’re 
doing. 

Let  me  begin  by  stating  the  facts.  To  clarify,  if  we  do  nothing 
here,  junk  faxes  will  end  on  July  1st.  This  legislation  that’s  before 
us  does  not  ban  junk  faxes,  it  lets  them  continue.  It’s  important 
that this fact is on the record and that everyone understands it, be-
cause  when  you  read  a  bill  that’s  called  The  Junk  Fax  Prevention 
Act,  you  think  that  you’re  doing  a  good  thing;  but,  in  essence, 
you’re promoting junk faxes. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

3

Let me explain in more detail. The FCC regulations scheduled to 
take  effect  on  July  1  says  that  someone  sending  a  junk  fax  needs 
written  consent  from  the  recipient.  Pretty  tough  rule.  You  can’t 
send  a  fax  unless  you  get  permission.  On  the  other  hand,  the  bill 
before us will allow any business with, ‘‘an established business re-
lationship  with  the  consumer  to  send  unrequested  faxes  to  that 
consumer’s  machine.’’  Now,  I’m  sure  you’ve  gotten  some  of  those 
Senator  Smith.  I  certainly  have.  And  it  makes  me  crazy,  using  up 
my  paper,  my  electricity,  to  come  into  my  house,  and  I  don’t  want 
another  mortgage.  You  know?  I’ve  got  a  good  one.  And  if  I  want 
a  better  one,  I’ll  take  action.  And  these  people  are  sending  me 
things.  I’m  getting  them  every  day.  And  what  I  should  have  done 
is  collected  them,  since  December,  but  I  didn’t.  Maybe  I’ll  start 
today,  and  we’ll  see  how  many  we’ll  have  when  we  get  this  to  the 
floor. 

Consumers  interact  with  hundreds,  if  not  thousands  of  busi-
nesses,  each  year.  To  say  that  all  those  businesses  should  then  be 
allowed  to  indiscriminately  flood  individuals  with  faxes  in  per-
petuity does not put a stop to a lot of our junk faxes. In fact, I be-
lieve it will open up the flood gates. 

One expert estimates—listen to this—that 2 billion faxes are sent 
every  year,  and  that  this  language,  the  language  in  this  bill,  will 
allow  for  4  billion  faxes  in  the  near  future.  Think  of  it.  Under  the 
bill that my colleague supports, which I hope we’re going to be able 
to  amend,  any  restaurant,  drug  store,  or  gas  station  that  a  con-
sumer  has  visited  will  be  able  to  send  junk  faxes  to  their  home  or 
business fax machines. 

Junk  faxes  tie  up  machines  of  individuals  and  businesses,  ren-
dering them unusable to their owners. It is not a trivial matter. It 
can  be  quite  serious.  For  example,  the  University  of  Washington 
Medical  Center  in  Seattle  had  to  go  to  court  to  stop  a  sender  of 
junk faxes who was crippling its machines, and, therefore, compro-
mising patient care. 

Under this bill, the University of Washington Medical Center, or 
any other hospital, could be contacted by any drug or medical sup-
ply company, janitorial service, cleaning product, telephone system, 
or  courier  they  had  ever  used,  and  have  junk  faxes  sent  to  them. 
So  we  are  opening  the  door  to  junk  faxes  wide  open.  I  never 
thought that’s what Senator Smith intended to do. But, in essence, 
that’s what your bill does. 

As  the  San  Jose  Mercury  News  editorial  page  stated  on  August 
27,  2004,  ‘‘Junk  faxes  rival  only  spam  as  the  most  egregious  form 
of  intrusive  marketing.  They  unfairly  force  recipients  to  pay,  in 
reams of paper and toner cartridges, for ads they never asked for.’’
Now, I acknowledge that the Federal Communications rule went 
too far. I think it’s too burdensome to have to get a written consent 
for a business. And requiring such consent from every fax recipient, 
it  is  too  burdensome,  and  it’s  too  expensive  for  small  businesses 
and  others.  But  I  disagree  that  an  established  business  relation-
ship  should  constitute  consent  for  businesses  to  send  faxes  to 
homes  and  business  just  because  I  walk  into  a  store  and  buy  a 
product  in  that  store.  Part  of  the  deal  was,  I  gave  my  money,  and 
I  got  the  product,  and  that’s  the  end  of  the  deal.  The  deal  doesn’t 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

4

mean  that  they  can  fax  me  forever.  As  much  as  I  might  love  that 
store, I’m not inviting them into my home. 

So  here’s  what  I  think  we  should  do.  Instead  of  written  consent, 
I  would  support  allowing  verbal  consent  to  suffice  before  a  fax  is 
sent. I think that’s a pretty fair deal. You want to send a fax? Get 
verbal  consent.  That’s  important.  Get  consent.  There  must  be  con-
sent.  Because  I  buy  toothpaste  at  Wal-Mart  or  I  order  pizza  from 
Domino’s doesn’t mean that Wal-Mart or Domino’s should have the 
right to fax me, at will, with anything they want. 

So, in closing, the bill before us cancels the FCC’s regulation, and 
it goes too far in the opposite direction. We shouldn’t let it become 
law  without  provisions  to  protect  consumers.  Surely  we  can  pass 
more reasonable legislation. We’ve done it on the Do Not Call List. 
That’s one of our most popular pieces of legislation. 

So  now  we  have  a  bill  before  us.  It’s  misnamed  The  Junk  Fax 
Prevention  Act,  when,  in  fact,  it  weakens,  by  miles,  an  FCC  rule 
that I admit has gone too far. This takes us in the other direction, 
and  it  sanctions  probably  4  billion  faxes  a  year.  We,  as  policy-
makers,  should  protect  consumers  from  junk  faxes,  and  I  want  to 
find  this  middle  ground.  And  I’m  hopeful  that  this  panel  will  help 
us toward that middle ground. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  SMITH.  Thank  you,  Senator  Boxer.  And  there  will  be  a 
mark-up tomorrow, and we’ll certainly consider your ideas for find-
ing that right middle ground. I think that is all of our motives. 

We’ve been joined by Senator Lautenberg, of New Jersey. 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  I 

commend you for holding this hearing. 

People  are  weary  of  hearing  the  fax  machine  beckon  your  atten-
tion and finding out that you got another chance to buy stocks you 
didn’t need. But it is, unfortunately, a good way to curtail the inva-
sion of privacy, as Senator Boxer just said. You know, we did it on 
telephone calls; why shouldn’t we be able to do the same thing con-
cerning the unwanted faxes? The issue of unsolicited fax advertise-
ments  dates  back  to  1991,  when  we  passed  the  Telephone  Con-
sumer  Protection  Act.  Now,  that  law,  still  in  effect,  generally  pro-
hibits  anyone  from  faxing  unsolicited  advertisements  without, 
‘‘prior expression—express invitation or permission from the recipi-
ent.’’

In October 1992, the FCC released its original order interpreting 
the  ban  on  unsolicited  faxes.  That  order  contained  a  footnote  that 
facsimile transmission from persons or entities who have an estab-
lished business relationship with the recipient can be deemed to be 
invited or permitted by the recipient. 

Now,  this  interpretation  was  followed  for  more  than  a  decade, 
but in July 2003 the Commission reversed its position. As a result, 
many  businesses  and  nonprofit  organizations  are  confused  about 
what is and is not permissible, and we need to clear up this confu-
sion,  while  still  protecting  consumers  from  faxes  that  they  don’t 
want and allowing them to receive those they do. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

5

I’m  an  original  co-sponsor  of  the  Junk  Fax  bill.  It  is  a  sensible 
compromise.  It  balances  the  need  for  businesses,  nonprofit  organi-
zations,  and  trade  groups  to  continue  to  communicate  with  their 
consumers  and  members,  while  recognizing  the  right  of  the  con-
sumer  to  say  ‘‘no  thanks’’  to  unsolicited  faxes.  The  bill  gives  con-
sumers an easy way to opt out of receiving unsolicited faxes, at no 
cost  to  themselves.  And,  finally,  it  requires  the  FCC  to  report  an-
nually  on  the  enforcement  of  the  junk  fax  provision,  so  we’ll  know 
how well these protections are working. And with effective enforce-
ment  and  oversight,  I  believe  that  this  bill  will  serve  the  public 
well. 

I thank you, again, Mr. Chairman, and I look forward to the tes-
timony of the witnesses and the opportunity to ask questions. And, 
Mr.  Chairman,  I  have  a  briefing,  a  sensitive  briefing  that  I  must 
go to. I assume the record will be kept open so that we can submit 
questions. 

Senator  SMITH.  We’ll  keep  the  record  open,  Senator,  so  you  can 

ask, in writing, any questions you like. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you. 
Our  witnesses  will  go  in  this  order:  Mr.  Jon  Bladine,  President 
and  Publisher  of  the  News-Register  Publishing  Company,  in 
McMinnville,  Oregon;  Mr.  Dave  Feeken,  Broker  of  RE/MAX  of  the 
Peninsula,  Kenai,  Alaska—you’ve  come  a  long  way,  and  we  thank 
you for that; and Mr. Steve Kirsch, Founder and Chairman of Pro-
pel Software Corporation, in San Jose, California. We thank you for 
being here. 

So, Jon, the mike’s yours. We invite your testimony now. 

STATEMENT OF JON E. BLADINE, PRESIDENT/PUBLISHER, 

NEWS–REGISTER PUBLISHING COMPANY 

Mr. BLADINE. Thank you, Senator. 
Good  afternoon,  Mr.  Chairman,  Members  of  the  Committee.  My 
name  is  Jon  Bladine,  better  known  in  my  community  as  Jeb 
Bladine. I’m here to testify in support of S. 714. 

I’d  like  to  summarize  my  testimony  and  provide  a  longer  state-

ment for the record, if I may. 

Senator  SMITH.  Yes,  we’ll  accept  that.  And  you  can  shorten  your 
statements, if you want, if you have longer ones, all of you. We will 
include them in the record. 
Mr. BLADINE. Thank you. 
I  am  president  and  publisher  of  the  News-Register 

in 
McMinnville.  Our  family  business  spans  four  generations,  since 
1928, with business interests that include the newspaper, commer-
cial  printing,  Internet  access,  and  Internet  software  development. 
I’m  here  today,  though,  in  my  role  as  regional  director  of  the  Na-
tional  Newspaper  Association,  a  board  on  which  I  represent  com-
munity  newspapers  from  Alaska,  Idaho,  Montana,  Oregon,  and 
Washington. 

The  National  Newspaper  Association  has  nearly  2,500  members 
across  America,  and  all  of  them  are  alarmed  at  the  prospects  of  a 
signed-consent  rule  for  commercial  faxes.  The  FCC  order  elimi-
nated  the  exemption  for  established  business  relationship,  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

6

would  now  require  that  we  get  written  and  signed  permission  be-
fore sending any advertising-related fax. 

The established business relationship was sufficient before. With 
this  order,  we  would  have  to  maintain  a  costly  database  and  com-
pliance system or abandon fax communications altogether. But the 
true  faxers,  those  whose  practices  are  already  illegal,  would  con-
tinue. So, with that order, the guilty would proceed, and this order 
would punish the innocent. 

We  were  grateful  that  that  deadline  was  extended.  But  now  we 
are facing a July 1 compliance date. Unless Congress acts now, the 
cost of compliance with the FCC order will start to hit our balance 
sheets in a matter of days. 

Junk  faxes  waste  resources  at  our  business,  too.  But  that  blitz 
of  anonymous  ads  does  not  come  from  the  newspapers  that  I  rep-
resent, and they don’t come from the small businesses across Amer-
ica. We use the fax machine as an efficient and urgent tool to com-
municate information to people who want it. S. 714 would allow us 
to continue that responsible use of fax machines. 

I’d like to give a brief sense of how we use the facsimile machine. 
We  send  rate  cards  and  market  information  to  people  who  request 
it.  We  send  information  about  advertising,  circulation,  distribution 
zones.  The  signed-consent  rule  would  stop  our  advertising  depart-
ment  in  its  tracks  every  day,  maybe  every  hour.  That  department 
generates  more  than  80  percent  of  our  newspaper  revenue,  so 
that’s a pretty important thing. 

My  newspaper  has  more  than  5,000  current  advertising  clients, 
and  many  more  who  call  for  information.  They  call  from  local,  re-
gional,  and  national  offices.  To  comply  with  the  signed-consent 
rule,  we  would  need  a  fax  approval  file  that  might  reach  20,000 
numbers. 

Many of our customers advertise only in special sections. For ex-
ample,  a  wedding  shop  might  miss  the  announcement  about  the 
bridal  guide,  and  miss  the  single  best  marketing  week  of  the  sea-
son.  We  fax  those  announcements,  because  the  advertisers  prefer 
it, quickly, with the information that they want to get. 

Our  clients  want  to  see  their  ads  in  advance,  and  the  fax  ma-
chine  often  is  the  only  realistic  way  to  deliver  them.  E-mail  has 
many  problems  with  software  and  file  attachments.  In-person  de-
livery is very expensive. So we use the fax machine. 

The  FCC  order  would  require  that  we  interfere  with  our  cus-
tomers’  lives  to  get  signed  consent  forms.  My  colleague,  Cheryl 
Kaechele,  of  Michigan,  described  this  burden  last  summer,  when 
she  testified  before  the  House  of  Representatives.  She  described 
that, ‘‘We would have to deliver thousands of consent forms, try to 
convince clients that we need them, send staff out again and again 
to  collect  them,  apologize  for  bothering  them,  hire  staff  to  manage 
the process. Our newspaper members say that they would need the 
equivalent of a half-time person to comply with that rule.’’

And,  even  then,  even  if  we  were  99  percent  compliant,  still  fax 
numbers  change,  people  make  mistakes.  We  worry  that  people 
might change their mind overnight about us, because of something 
we  write.  An  angry  reader  might  spot  a  fax  that  falls  within  that 
1 percent margin of error, and, aha, a lawsuit. We would pay, even 
if the real conflict had nothing to do with the fax. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

7

This  bill  restores  a  sensible  flow  of  commerce  on  fax  machines. 
It  recognizes  established  business  relationships.  Most  importantly, 
it  tells  regulators  to  consider  the  true  problem.  Real  junk  fax 
doesn’t  come  from  newspapers  or  other  business  that  have  solid 
customer relationships. It comes from people trying to make a buck 
without  building  a  business  around  respectable  business  practices. 
The  solution  is  sound  enforcement  of  laws  against  fax  abusers, 
not punishing innocent small businesses. Congress can improve en-
forcement, and S. 714 takes a sound step in that direction. Our as-
sociation,  the  National  Newspaper  Association,  looks  forward  to 
working  with  this  Committee  for  quick  passage  of  this  legislation. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you very much. 
Mr. BLADINE. Thank you, Senator. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Bladine follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JON E. BLADINE, PRESIDENT/PUBLISHER,

NEWS-REGISTER PUBLISHING COMPANY 

Good  afternoon.  My  name  is  Jon  E.  (Jeb)  Bladine.  My  purpose  here  today  is  to 
testify  in  support  of  S.  714,  The  Junk  Fax  Prevention  Act  of  2005.  Junk  faxes  are 
the bane of many small businesses, including mine, and I want to congratulate Sen-
ator  Smith  and  his  co-sponsors  for  introducing  a  reasonable  way  to  address  them 
while trying to avoid undue burdens on businesses that use the fax machine respon-
sibly. 
1. Introduction and Biography 

I  am  Publisher  and  Editor  of  the  News-Register  Publishing  Company  in 
McMinnville,  Oregon.  I  am  president  of  Oregon  Lithoprint,  Inc.,  a  partner  in 
McMinnville  Access  Company  and  Pacific  Wave  Communications,  and  chairman  of 
the  board  of  Oregon  Interactive  Corporation.  Those  titles  are  the  long  version  of 
what  I  really  do,  which  is  to  deliver  information  in  print  and  electronically  to  my 
community in Northwest Oregon, and through the Internet, worldwide. 

My  newspaper,  the  News-Register,  has  been  in  our  family  since  my  grandfather 
purchased  it  in  1928  and  moved  to  Oregon  from  Iowa.  Our  family  business  spans 
four  generations,  and  I  am  the  fourth  family  member  to  serve  as  publisher.  Our 
business  interests  include  the  newspaper,  commercial  printing,  Internet  access  and 
Internet software development. 

in 

I  have  served 

local  and  statewide  civic  organizations, 

including  the 
McMinnville Jaycees, McMinnville and Oregon downtown development associations, 
Oregon  Children’s  Services  and  the  Oregon  Heritage  Commission.  I  have  been  a 
board  member,  legislative  chairman  and  president  of  the  Oregon  Newspaper  Pub-
lishers Association. 

I am here today in my role as a regional director of the National Newspaper Asso-
ciation,  a  120-year-old  organization  of  community  newspapers.  NNA  maintains  a 
headquarters co-located with the University of Missouri, Columbia, MO, and a small 
office  in  Arlington,  Virginia,  to  carry  out  our  public  affairs  work.  My  job  on  the 
board, among other things, is to speak for community newspapers in my five states: 
Alaska, Idaho, Montana, Oregon and Washington. 
2. Background of the Junk Fax Issue 

The  National  Newspaper  Association  has  nearly  2,500  members.  It  is  no  under-
statement  to  say  that  our  members  are  quite  alarmed  about  the  prospect  that  the 
Federal Communications Commission signed consent rule for commercial faxes goes 
into effect July 1. 

The  Federal  Communications  Commission  delivered  quite  a  jolt  to  our  industry 
with  its  Report  and  Order  In  the  Matter  of  Rules  and  Regulations  Implementing 
the Telephone Consumer Protection Act of 1991. That order, adopted June 26, 2003, 
and released July 3, 2003, turned our world upside down by reversing the Commis-
sion’s  long-standing  recognition  that  faxes  from  our  newspapers  to  our  established 
business  customers  are  not,  in  fact,  unsolicited  faxes  in  the  meaning  of  the  TCPA. 
In  discussion  of  its  Report  and  Order,  the  Commission  said  consumers  feel  ‘‘be-
sieged’’  by  unsolicited  faxes,  despite  the  fact  that  the  law  prohibited  them  before 
2003 and continues to do so. It announced:

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

8

‘‘The Commission has determined that the TCPA requires a person or entity to 
obtain  the  prior  express  invitation  or  permission  of  the  recipient  before  trans-
mitting  an  unsolicited  fax  advertisement.  This  express  invitation  or  permission 
must  be  in  writing  and  include  the  recipient’s  signature.  The  recipient  must 
clearly  indicate  that  he  or  she  consents  to  receiving  such  faxed  advertisements 
from  the  company  to  which  permission  is  given,  and  provide  the  individual  or 
business’s fax number to which faxes may be sent.’’

The Commission expressly reversed its decision that an established business rela-
tionship (EBR) would be sufficient to show that an individual or business had given 
consent  to  receive  a  fax.  This  new  rule  was  even  more  draconian  than  the  proce-
dures for compliance with the new Do Not Call rules, which were the principal sub-
ject  of  this  Report  and  Order.  At  least  in  those  rules,  businesses  were  permitted  to 
maintain  relationships  with  their  customers.  Here,  barring  the  creation  of  a  costly 
database and compliance system, we will have to halt our recognized and traditional 
means of conveying information to people who want to receive faxes. 

To  add  to  our  consternation,  the  Commission  initially  permitted  our  businesses 
only  about  six  weeks  to  come  into  compliance.  I  know  concerned  and  agitated  busi-
ness  owners  and  staffers  all  over  the  country  besieged  the  Commission  and  this 
Committee  about  that  short  deadline.  I  know  staffers  besieged  most  of  our  pub-
lishers’ offices as our marketing departments envisioned their summer turning into 
a  futile  scramble  to  obtain  these  consent  forms  in  time.  Fortunately,  the  Commis-
sion relented and extended the deadline, and then extended it again. 

Now  we  are  staring  down  the  barrel  of  a  July  1  compliance  date.  And  again,  un-
less  we  set  up  costly  database  and  compliance  systems,  we  will  see  our  use  of  the 
fax come to a halt this summer. 

This  is  why  we  need  Congress  to  pass  S.  714—and  to  move  as  urgently  as  pos-
sible.  The  expense  will  settle  on  our  balance  sheets  this  spring,  within  a  matter  of 
days, if action is not taken. 
3. The Truth About Junk Fax 

All of us have seen our paper and ink go to waste from junk fax, for things rang-
ing  from  cruises  to  low  rate  mortgages  to  health  regimens  for  body  parts  that  we 
don’t  all  necessarily  have.  None  of  us  like  it.  We  may  differ  in  our  tolerance  for 
other  people  using  our  machines  to  convey  their  commercial  messages.  But  I  hear 
complaints, and I complain myself from time to time. 

However, it is important to remember that the newspapers I represent, and most 
of America’s small businesses, are not producing this blitz of fax ads that so irritate 
us.  We  use  the  fax  machine  as  a  convenience  and  an  efficient  and  urgent  tool  to 
communicate information to people who want it. The FCC’s signed consent rule trips 
us up without presenting much of a barrier to those irritating blast faxers. 

I  assume  that  most  of  what  we  are  complaining  about  already  falls  into  the  cat-
egory of illegal faxes. Certainly, most of what I get comes from places I never heard 
of, and certainly not from companies with which I have an established business re-
lationship.  They  were  illegal  before  the  FCC  acted.  They  will  be  illegal  after  July 
1.  And  they  will  continue  to  flow  illegally  after  July  1,  while  legitimate  commerce 
either  abandons  fax  communication  or  absorbs  a  major  and  wasteful  cost.  Mean-
while, the junk faxers will continue to pursue their trade. 
4. How Newspapers use Faxes 

I  would  like  to  give  this  Committee  a  better  sense  of  how  we  use  the  facsimile 

machine. 
A. Rate Cards and Market Information Requests 

We  send  information  about  the  newspaper  and  website  ad  rates  to  those  who  re-
quest them every day. These are business requests for information about our news-
paper  and  website  advertising  rates,  information  about  upcoming  special  sections, 
market  information  about  circulation  numbers  and  distribution  zones,  and  more. 
The  signed  consent  fax  rule  would  stop  our  advertising  department  in  its  tracks 
every  day.  Maybe  every  hour.  Since  more  than  80  percent  of  our  revenue  is  gen-
erated by that department, it’s pretty important. 

In  the  past  year  we  ran  advertisements  for  5,225  different  customers.  Some  ran 
only  one  ad  in  that  year;  some  ran  several  each  week.  Many  times  that  number  of 
potential customers telephone for information because they are considering running 
ads in our market. Also, many of our customers have multiple decision makers from 
a  local  store,  regional  headquarters,  national  headquarters,  buying  service,  adver-
tising  agency,  etc.  It  is  no  exaggeration  to  suggest  that  our  small  company  would 
be required to maintain a FAX approval file with nearly 20,000 FAX numbers if we 
had to comply with this rule. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

9

These requests require the fax machine. Most advertising decisions are very time-
sensitive.  Since  customers  and  potential  customers  need  information  quickly,  they 
routinely  ask  us  to  FAX  information  to  them  rather  than  mail  it.  That  information 
might  be  a  rate  card,  information  on  a  special  edition,  market  demographics,  dead-
line  reminders  or  credit  forms.  E-mails  sometimes  are  a  nice  substitute,  but  there 
are  many  problems  with  e-mail  attachments.  Many  businesses  still  don’t  have  e-
mail,  but  they  all  have  fax  machines.  When  people  request  information,  they  want 
a hard copy now, without having to figure out e-mail attachments. 
B. Special Sections 

The  bread  and  butter  of  a  community  newspaper  is  its  special  section  calendar. 
In  that  sense,  we  may  be  a  little  like  magazines.  We  cover  the  routine  city  council 
and school board news, but we also publish special sections that interest particular 
segments  of  our  advertising  clients  and  our  subscribers.  Our  subjects  range  from 
bridal guides to sports reviews, from back-to-school to holiday gifts, from health and 
fitness to home and gardens, from economic development to community heritage. 

Among our 5,000-plus customers, many advertise with us only when one of these 
sections  is  available.  A  bridal  shop,  for  example,  could  miss  the  single  best  mar-
keting week of the season if it misses out on our special section announcement. Why 
do we fax it? Because the advertisers prefer to receive it that way. They don’t have 
time to scroll through a hundred e-mails a day, and the mailbox contains a similar 
amount  of  material  they  don’t  want.  The  fax  gets  to  them  quickly  and  gives  them 
what they need. 
C. Advertising Proofs 

I  know  that  in  Washington,  DC,  most  advertising  is  created  by  fancy  agencies 
that  do  the  work  for  a  fee.  In  McMinnville,  the  advertising  agency  for  most  small 
businesses is the News-Register. A business may phone and talk out an ad concept 
by  phone,  but  the  owner  wants  to  see  it  before  it  is  published—to  make  changes, 
sign  off,  have  time  to  prepare  point  of  purchase  materials  that  may  be  integrated 
with the newspaper piece. 

The  fax  machine  is  the  only  realistic  way  to  get  that  proof  to  a  small  business. 
The e-mail route creates many problems with applications and attachments. We use 
a  sophisticated  design  program  that  few  non-advertising  businesses  keep  on  their 
own  machines.  If  we  send  them  the  proof  in  the  native  application,  they  can’t  open 
it.  If  we  send  it  in  Adobe  Acrobat,  they  usually  can’t  edit  it,  and  sometimes  they 
can’t even open it. If they don’t have a computer, or their computer is on the blink, 
or the guy who usually runs it is gone that day, they are sunk. So they want a fax. 
The  other  choice  is  for  someone  to  drive  the  proof  to  a  customer,  but  that  creates 
tremendous costs in manpower and fuel, as in pre-FAX days. 
D. Invoices and Bookkeeping 

We send monthly statements to our advertisers. Those travel by mail. Often, how-
ever,  advertisers  call  with  questions,  requests  for  adjustments,  extra  copies  and  so 
forth. Those often travel by fax. And since they concern advertising, I would assume 
the Commission would expect us to have consent forms before we sent them. 
E. Other Uses 

A  host  of  other  creative  ways  are  used  in  small  towns  to  keep  people  informed. 
For  example,  NNA’s  member,  the  semi-weekly  Wise  County  Messenger  in  Decatur, 
TX,  has  a  daily  fax  newspaper  ‘‘Update’’  that  is  distributed  to  about  1,000  of  its 
business  and  residential  subscribers,  with  news  and  advertising  promotions  that 
break between weekly editions. 

Finally,  many  of  our  members  provide  a  public  fax  service.  By  that  I  mean  that 
they  may  own  the  only  fax  machine  in  town  that  is  available  for  public  use.  That 
is  critical,  particularly  for  senior  citizens  who  may  not  have  an  office  where  a  fax 
machine is available. These newspapers—usually in small towns—permit citizens to 
come  in  and  use  it  as  needed.  This  is  a  practice  that  would  surely  come  to  an  end 
under the FCC rule because citizens would not commonly possess the signed consent 
forms.  The  publishers  could  not  risk  the  liability  of  improper  use,  and  they  would 
not  want  to  generate  ill  will  with  their  customers  by  trying  to  explain  all  the  new 
rules of faxing. 
5. The Compliance Cost 

The principal concern with the signed consent rule is the Compliance cost. I men-
tioned  the  size  of  database  we  would  need  to  set  up  as  a  tracking  system  for  our 
group of businesses. While my company is among the larger ones in the community 
newspaper industry with about 120 employees, many of NNA’s members have fewer 
than 10 employees. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

10

The  Commission  has  asked  us  to  set  up  an  entire  system  to  interfere  with  our 
busy  customers’  lives  so  we  can  get  these  forms,  and  to  repeatedly  bother  them  to 
keep the forms up to date. I’m going to borrow from my colleague, Cheryl Kaechele, 
who  described  the  burden  of  compliance  last  summer  when  she  testified  before  the 
House of Representatives about this rule.

‘‘Here  is  what  I  believe  most  of  my  publisher  colleagues  would  have  to  do,  in 
order to comply with this rule:
1) Acquire or upgrade a database program;
2) Mail out, or hand carry, several thousand consent forms;
3) Explain over and over, at the post office, at the golf course, at church, stand-
ing  in  the  school  parking  lot,  that,  yes,  we  really  must  have  these  forms  back;
4) Send someone out again to get some of them back;
5) Send someone out yet again to get some of them back;
6)  Explain  over  and  over  on  the  phone,  ‘no,  we  can’t  fax  you  the  ad  rates,  be-
cause you forgot to send your form back;’
7)  Apologize  to  an  irate  customer,  while  standing  in  the  post  office  or  in  the 
school parking lot;
8) Send someone out still again to get some of them back;
9) Hire someone to file them, make a note of them in the database, and remem-
ber  to  check  them  periodically  to  make  sure  nothing  has  changed;  and 
then . . .
10) Send someone out again to get new forms back.
‘‘You  get  the  picture.  It  is  going  to  require,  in  all  probability,  hiring  someone 
to  do  this  work.  Or  it  will  require  shifting  someone  from  selling  ads  or  writing 
stories  to  take  on  this  new  task.’’  (Testimony  of  Cheryl  Kaechele,  Publisher  of 
Allegan  County  (MI)  News,  before  the  House  Subcommittee  on  Telecommuni-
cations and the Internet, June 15, 2004.)

Really,  what  Cheryl  is  saying,  is  that  the  FCC  is  requiring  us  to  spend  a  lot  of 
time and money, and our customers’ time and money, getting customers to do what 
they  don’t  want  to  do—drop  everything  to  sign  yet  another  form.  And  for  what?  To 
stop  junk  fax?  It  won’t  stop  junk  fax.  But  it  would  hurt  a  lot  of  small  businesses. 
NNA  doesn’t  do  a  lot  of  survey  work.  Our  association  is  small,  and  surveys  can 
be quite costly. But we did ask members to give us a sense in 2003 of the cost they 
anticipated for compliance. Most of them told us they would be spending the equiva-
lent  of  a  half-time  staff  position  to  comply.  This  is  a  cost,  for  many  small  weeklies, 
that makes the difference between a profitable year and a loss. 
6. The Threat of Litigation 

One  of  the  most  awesome  and  harmful  aspects  of  the  signed  consent  rule  is  the 
obvious  threat  that  it  leaves  hanging  over  every  small  business.  Fax  numbers 
change.  We  may  forget  to  file  a  form,  or  lose  it.  Someone  with  apparent  authority 
to  sign  a  form  might  never  tell  the  boss,  and  then  resign  without  our  knowing  the 
situation has changed. What is probably most worrisome to those of us in the jour-
nalism  business  is  that  people  can  change  their  minds  about  us  overnight  because 
of something we wrote. 

Certainly, we comply today with do-not-call and do-not-send requests. We get very 
few. And 99 percent of the time, we know for a fact that the faxes we send are going 
to people who want them. But in that troubling 1 percent margin of error may lurk 
the  angry  politician  or  community  activist  who  disagreed  with  something  I  wrote 
in  an  editorial—and  suddenly  spies  a  fax  from  our  marketing  department  on  the 
table. Aha! Maybe we don’t have the signed consent form. And here comes a lawsuit. 
Will  we  have  the  form?  Will  we  find  it  in  time?  Will  I  have  to  pull  Marketing  off 
their campaign of the week to prepare a defense? And if we’ve messed up that time, 
will  we  pay,  even  though  we  know—and  the  recipient  in  all  honesty  knows—the 
issue  isn’t  about  the  fax  at  all?  If  you  think  that  doesn’t  happen  to  newspapers, 
come sit in my office for a day when there is a local zoning dispute or controversial 
referendum on the table. 
7. S. 714 Takes a Sensible Approach. 

This bill gives us some breathing room and restores the sensible flow of commerce 

on the fax machine. 

It recognizes the importance of established business relationships. 
It requires us to tell customers how to stop future faxes from coming. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

11

It  makes  us  responsible  to  demonstrate  that  we  had  the  consent  to  send,  should 

a dispute arise—as we have that responsibility today. 

It tasks the regulators with looking closely at where the real problem comes from. 
I  don’t  think  the  FCC  will  decide,  if  it  looks  closely,  that  most  of  the  junk  fax  is 
coming from us, or any other business that expects to maintain a solid relationship 
with  its  customers.  Like  spam,  it  comes  from  those  who  use  the  new  technologies 
of  our  age  to  latch  onto  the  low  barriers  to  entry  in  business.  They  are  trying  to 
make a buck without going to the trouble of building a respectable business around 
respectable business practices. 

As an Internet company owner, I can assure you that efforts to stop spam by reg-
ulating our responsible use haven’t made a dent in that practice. The signed consent 
rule  will  do  no  better  with  faxes.  The  solutions  are  found  in  transparency,  sound 
enforcement,  and  education  of  consumers  on  how  to  do  business  with  people  they 
can  trust.  When  spam  and  junk  fax  cease  to  be  profitable,  they  will  cease  to  exist. 
Congress can do a lot to improve the transparency and sound enforcement. S. 714 
takes  a  solid  and  sound  step  in  that  direction,  and  I  am  delighted  to  declare  the 
support of our organization for it. We look forward to working with this Committee 
for quick passage of this legislation.

Senator SMITH. Thank you. 
I  notice  that  a  vote  has  started,  so  we  can  either  try  and  finish 

with our witnesses——

Senator BOXER. Let’s try to finish. 
Senator SMITH. OK. 
Mr. ‘‘Fakeen’’—did I pronounce that correctly? 
Mr. FEEKEN. ‘‘Feeken.’’
Senator SMITH. ‘‘Feeken,’’ I’m sorry. 

STATEMENT OF DAVE FEEKEN, BROKER, RE/MAX; ON BEHALF 

OF THE NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF REALTORS  (NAR) 

Mr. FEEKEN. Thank you. 
Senator Smith and Members of the Committee, my name is Dave 
Feeken. I’m a broker of a RE/MAX real-estate office in Kenai, Alas-
ka. Our office is both a residential and commercial office. I am here 
representing the National Association of Realtors. 

NAR  is  the  Nation’s  largest  trade  association,  with  1.2  million 
members.  Our  members  include  brokers,  sales  people,  property 
managers,  and  other  professionals  engaged  in  every  aspect  of  the 
real-estate industry. 

I appreciate the opportunity to share our thoughts regarding The 
Junk Fax Prevention Act of 2005, and commend the Committee for 
its  leadership  in  recognizing  that  the  Federal  Communications 
Commission’s  revised  rules  governing  the  use  of  facsimile  trans-
missions are a radical departure from current practices, and would 
significantly interfere with day-to-day business activities. 

First,  let  me  say  that  NAR’s  members  understand  and  strongly 
support the goals of the Telephone Consumer Protection Act. Real-
tors,  themselves,  are  the  recipient  of  unsolicited  faxes  that  tie  up 
our business fax machines. We understand the problem this legisla-
tion is intending to address. NAR does, however, question the need 
for the change that the FCC has made to the TCPA rules. 

The prior rules, with its established business relationship excep-
tion, has worked well over the past 12 years. In reversing its rule, 
the  Commission  could  not  measure  the  extent  to  which  consumer 
complaints received were, in fact, the result of faxes sent as the re-
sult  of  the  established  business  relationship,  except  as  opposed  to 
those  sent  in  violation  of  the  underlying  ban  on  faxes  sent  outside 
of an EBR. However, it is clear that the Commission’s revised rules 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

12

to  address  unsolicited  faxes  would  have  the  unintended  con-
sequences of interfering with solicited faxes. 

Despite all the advances in technology, the process of buying and 
selling  real  estate  is  still  dependent  upon  faxes.  And  while  faxes 
most  commonly  used  today  are  to  facilitate  the  paperwork  associ-
ated  with  a  home  sale,  faxes  are  also  used  in  ways  that  could  be 
construed  as  advertisement  or  solicitation,  and  would,  therefore, 
meet the FCC’s definition of an unsolicited fax. 

Let me give you an example or two. Real-estate professionals use 
faxes  to  communicate  quickly  and  inexpensively  with  consumers 
who  have  contacted  them.  Take  the  case  of  a  homeowner  looking 
for  an  agent  to  help  them  sell  their  home.  After  an  initial  phone 
call, an agent could offer to prepare a comparative market analysis 
for  a  seller’s  review.  This  CMA  provides  comparative  listing  data 
on other homes on the market, describes what the agent will do to 
market  the  home,  and  proactively  solicits  the  listing.  These  CMAs 
are  most  often  faxed  prior  to  a  face-to-face  meeting.  Under  the  re-
vised rules, faxing this presentation would not be permissible with-
out prior signed permission. 

Real-estate  brokers  and  agents  also  use  faxes  to  send  home  list-
ing  information  directly  to  potential  buyers  who  request  it.  Under 
the revised rules, the real-estate agent could no longer followup on 
callers’ requests for information on homes on the market with a fax 
of available properties. In a tight housing market, and those of you 
who  live  in  this  market  know  what  a  tight  housing  market  is,  the 
delay  caused  could  have—in  obtaining  the  written  permission  or 
mailing  the  information,  could  mean  the  difference  between  a 
buyer successfully purchasing a home, or not. 

Consider,  too,  how  awkward  this  scenario  would  be  when  a  po-
tential customer calls and asks for information on a home for sale. 
As  I’ve  said,  under  the  revised  rules  the  agent  would  not  be  able 
to fax the information requested. Instead, the agent would have to 
explain  why  they  can’t  fax  the  info,  direct  the  consumer  to  a 
Website  where  they  can  provide  there  required  written  consent,  or 
ask for an address so the agent can mail or courier the information, 
along with the consent form for future use. This will create frustra-
tion, suspicion, and, in some cases, ill will. This will be a giant step 
backwards  in  a  business  where  good  customer  service  depends  on 
quick turnaround. 

And  while  I  was  asked  to  speak  to  the  use  of  faxes  in  commu-
nications  with  consumers,  I  also  must  point  out  that  organizations 
like NAR and its state and local associations routinely use faxes to 
communicate  with  members.  Those  faxes  inform  members  about 
classes, products and services available to them, often at the mem-
ber’s  preferred  price.  Once  again,  since  these  opportunities  are 
available for a fee, these faxes would meet the definition of an un-
solicited fax. 

The  FCC  has  argued  that  obtaining  written  permission  to  faxes 
is  not  difficult.  We  disagree.  Each  of  the  means  provided  by  the 
FCC for obtaining written permission—face-to-face meetings, direct 
mail, and e-mail with electronic signature—presents a challenge for 
the  consumers  and  the  real-estate  professionals.  Interestingly 
enough,  the  one  technology  which  is  fast,  inexpensive,  and  widely 
available is not an allowed means of distributing or returning per-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

13

mission forms. That technology is fax. In discussing the FCC, staff 
has  indicated  that  faxing  the  permission  form  would  not  be  al-
lowed, since the form could be construed as a solicitation for which 
written permission is needed. 

Finally,  we  would  like  to  have  been  able  to  quantify  for  you  the 
likely cost of compliance with the revised FCC rule. Unfortunately, 
though,  we  are  unable  to  predict  how  more  than  1.2  million  Real-
tors,  approximately  12  million  home  sellers  and  home  buyers, 
would  have  interacted  if  the  revised  rules  had  been  in  place  last 
year.  In  our  written  testimony,  however,  we  presented  some  con-
servative,  simple  assumptions.  We  estimate  that  a  minimum  of 
over  66  million  written  permissions  would  have  been  required  to 
sustain last year’s roughly six million home sales, 66 million forms 
that  would  have  had  to  have  been  printed,  sent,  collected,  and 
stored on the residential side of the real-estate business, alone. Ob-
viously,  the  dollar  costs  involved  in  the  preparation,  distribution, 
and management of 66 million forms would be sizable. As a result, 
NAR  believes  that  it  is  critical  that  the  established  business-rela-
tionship  exemption,  which  has  functioned  well  since  the  FCC  first 
issued rulings to implement the TCPA some 12 years ago, be rees-
tablished, and that alternative means of giving consent be allowed. 
We  believe  that  narrowly  crafted  technical-correction  language  of 
The  Junk  Fax  Act  can  rectify  the  problems  created  by  the  new 
rules and continue protecting consumers from unwanted faxes that 
are already prohibited by the TCPA. 

We look forward to working with you and achieving this end and 

thank you for the opportunity to testify. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Feeken follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVE FEEKEN, BROKER, RE/MAX; ON BEHALF OF THE 

NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF REALTORS  (NAR) 

Chairman  Stevens,  Ranking  Member  Inouye,  Senator  Smith  and  Members  of  the 
Committee,  the  National  Association  of  REALTORS  (NAR)  appreciates  the  oppor-
tunity to share its thoughts regarding S. 714, the Junk Fax Prevention Act of 2005. 
NAR is the Nation’s largest professional trade association with over a million mem-
bers who belong to over 1,500 REALTOR  associations and boards at the state and 
local levels. NAR membership includes brokers, salespeople, property managers, ap-
praisers and counselors as well as others engaged in every aspect of the real estate 
industry. 

NAR  commends  the  Committee  for  its  leadership  in  recognizing  that  the  Federal 
Communication  Commission’s  (FCC)  revised  rules  governing  the  use  of  facsimile 
transmissions are a radical departure from current practice and would significantly 
interfere  with  day-to-day  businesses’  activities  and  impose  a  costly  new  compliance 
burden on business of all types. 

NAR understands the goal of Congress in enacting the Telephone Consumer Pro-
tection  Act  (TCPA)  was  to  protect  consumers’  privacy  expectations  to  not  be  both-
ered by unwanted faxes. As business people and consumers, REALTORS  are often 
the  recipients  of  unsolicited  faxes  that  tie  up  the  fax  machines  vital  to  their  real 
estate  practices.  We  strongly  support,  therefore,  the  goals  of  the  TCPA  and  believe 
that  the  law’s  provisions  banning  unsolicited  faxes  are  appropriate.  We  also  appre-
ciate the FCC’s efforts to craft rules to effectively implement the law and the Com-
mission’s  willingness  to  meet  with  NAR  leaders  as  we  have  worked  to  understand 
the new fax requirements. 

We do, however, question the need for the changes that the FCC has made to the 
rules  governing  the  fax  provisions  of  the  law.  The  prior  rules,  with  an  established 
business  relationship  (EBR)  exception  for  faxes  sent  by  firms  to  established  clients 
and  allowances  for  alternative  forms  of  permission,  have  worked  well  over  the  past 
12 years since implementation. The prior ruling created settled expectations among 
consumers and businesses alike. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

14

Now,  however,  it  is  also  very  clear  to  us  that  the  Commission’s  new  rules  in-
tended to stop unsolicited junk faxes will have the unintended consequences of inter-
fering with solicited faxes. In the case of the real estate industry, for example, faxes 
sent in response to a consumer inquiry or in the course of normal business and de-
sired  by  the  recipient  (consumer,  agent  or  firm)  will  no  longer  be  allowed.  In  addi-
tion, these new rules will also interfere with the NAR’s and its state and local asso-
ciations’  abilities  to  satisfy  members’  expectations  regarding  communications  and 
service. 

As a result, we believe that it is critical that (1) the established business relation-
ship  (EBR)  exception  which  has  functioned  well  since  the  FCC  first  issued  rules  to 
implement  of  the  TCPA  some  12  years  ago  be  reestablished  and  (2)  alternative 
means of giving consent be allowed. These two actions are necessary so that commu-
nication  with  existing  clients  and  those  who  have  inquired  about  a  good  or  service 
is not subject to overly burdensome and disruptive regulation. 

We  believe  that  narrowly  crafted,  technical  correction  language  such  as  is  being 
considered  by  the  Committee  in  the  Junk  Fax  Prevention  Act  of  2005,  can  rectify 
the  problems  created  by  the  new  FCC  rules  while  at  the  same  time  continuing  to 
protect  consumers  and  businesses  from  unwanted  faxes  that  are  already  prohibited 
by the TCPA. 
Background 

The  Telephone  Consumer  Protection  Act  (TCPA)  of  1991  prohibits  the  use  of  any 
telephone facsimile machine, computer or other device to send an ‘‘unsolicited adver-
tisement’’ to a telephone facsimile machine. An unsolicited advertisement is defined 
‘‘as any material advertising the commercial availability or quality of any property, 
goods or services which is transmitted to any person without that person’s prior ex-
press invitation or permission.’’ 1 

When first implementing the new law in 1992, the Federal Communications Com-
mission determined that an established business relationship constituted express in-
vitation or permission to receive an unsolicited fax. As part of its July 2003 Do-Not-
Call (DNC) rulemaking, the FCC revised that interpretation. 

In  reversing  its  long-standing  rule,  the  FCC  determined  that  the  TCPA  requires 
a  person  or  entity  to  obtain  the  express  invitation  or  permission  from  the  recipient 
before  transmitting  any  unsolicited  fax  advertisement.  This  express  invitation  or 
permission  must  be  in  writing  and  include  the  recipient’s  signature.  The  recipient 
must clearly indicate that he or she consents to receiving such faxed advertisements 
from  the  company  and  the  individual  within  the  company  to  which  permission  is 
given. Furthermore, the consent form must specify the individual and the fax num-
ber to which faxes may be sent. The permission form cannot be faxed to the recipi-
ent or submitted via fax to the entity to whom permission to fax is granted. 2 
The Importance of Faxed Information to the Real Estate Industry 

Despite  all  the  advances  in  communication  technology,  the  process  of  buying  and 
selling  a  home  is  still  heavily  dependent  on  the  ability  to  send  and  receive  faxed 
information.  Consequently,  real  estate  brokers  and  agents  use  facsimiles  regularly 
to  communicate  with  other  real  estate  professionals,  settlement  and  other  service 
firms, as well as with both home buyers and sellers. 

The most common use of fax by the real estate sales industry today is to facilitate 
the  completion  of  the  paperwork  associated  with  the  sales  transaction,  i.e.  offers  to 
purchase, counteroffers, disclosure forms, etc. While these transactional faxes seem-
ingly  would  be  exempt  from  the  new  rules,  faxes  are  also  routinely  used  for  pur-
poses  that  would  unfortunately  meet  the  current  definition  of  an  ‘‘unsolicited’’  fax. 
Business  to  Business  Faxes.  Real  estate  sales  agents  and  brokers  commonly 
use  facsimiles  to  quickly  share  new  property  listings  with  other  real  estate  profes-
sionals  who  are  active  in  a  given  market  and  may  have  clients  interested  in  pur-
chasing a newly listed property. In a survey of members of NAR, REALTORS  also 
indicated  that  faxes  are  commonly  used  to  inform  other  real  estate  professionals  of 
price  reductions  on  a  property  that  had  been  viewed  by  that  agent’s  clients  or  the 
time and date of open houses for newly listed homes. Such faxes communicate valu-
able market information that benefits recipients and their clients in a manner that 
is both timely and cost-effective. 

1 47 CFR § 64.1200(f)(10). 
2 2003 Report and Order, In the Matter of Rules and Regulations Implementing the Telephone 
Consumer  Protection  Act  of  1991,  CG  Docket  No.  02–278  ¶191  (rel.  July  3,  2003)  (‘‘2003  Report 
and Order’’). 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

15

Business  to  Consumer  Faxes.  Real  estate  sales  professionals  also  use  faxes  to 
communicate  in  a  quick  and  cost-effective  manner  with  consumers  who  are  looking 
to sell or buy a home. 

When  selling  their  home,  most  homeowners  contact  a  real  estate  professional  or 
a  number  of  agents  about  listing  the  house.  In  response  to  the  inquiry,  an  agent 
will  typically  prepare  a  comparative  market  analysis  which  (1)  describes  what  the 
agent  would  do  to  market  the  home,  (2)  provides  comparable  listing  data  on  homes 
currently on the market so as to begin discussion about a possible listing price and 
(3) proactively solicits the listing. 

In those situations where time is of the essence, this comparative analysis is faxed 
to the seller for review prior to any face-to-face meeting. In some cases, such as the 
sale of a resort or inherited property, a face-to-face meeting may not even occur due 
to time or distance constraints. In all cases, this informational exchange takes place 
prior  to  any  formal  business  agreement,  i.e.  listing  agreement,  which  could  provide 
a  vehicle  for  the  necessary  written  permission  to  fax.  Under  the  new  rules,  faxing 
this  listing  presentation  or  even  comparative  listing  information  would  not  be  per-
missible without prior signed permission. 

Real estate brokers and agents also routinely use faxes to send house listing infor-
mation directly to potential buyers who may request it by telephone, but with whom 
the  agent  has  not  yet  entered  into  a  formal  representation  agreement.  Under  the 
new  rules,  a  real  estate  professional  could  no  longer  share  new  listings  or  follow-
up  a  telephone,  personal  or  even  Internet-delivered  inquiry  with  targeted  research 
via  fax.  Consequently,  the  new  rules  meant  to  deal  with  unsolicited  faxes  would 
have the unintended effect of interfering with solicited faxes. 

In  a  tight  housing  market,  the  delay  caused  by  having  to  obtain  written  permis-
sion  from  a  potential  client  or  another  real  estate  professional  before  the  relevant 
house listing information is sent could mean the difference between a buyer getting 
a house they want or losing it. 

Consider too how awkward this scenario would be when a potential customer calls 
and  asks  for  information  on  a  home  for  sale.  Under  the  new  rule,  the  real  estate 
professional  would  not  be  able  to  fax  the  information  requested.  Instead  the  agent 
or  broker  will  have  to  explain  why  they  can’t  fax  the  information,  direct  the  con-
sumer  to  a  website  where  they  can  obtain  a  form  to  provide  the  required  written 
consent or ask for an address so the real estate professional can mail or courier the 
information  along  with  a  consent  form  for  future  use.  This  will  create  frustration, 
suspicion  and,  in  some  cases,  ill-will.  This  would  be  a  giant  step  backwards  in  a 
business where good customer service depends on quick turnaround. 

REALTOR  Association  to  Member  Fax.  Similarly,  NAR  and  its  state  and 
local  associations  routinely  use  facsimiles  to  communicate  quickly  and  efficiently 
with  members.  These  faxes  inform  members  about  upcoming  continuing  education 
classes, meetings, seminars, products, services, and membership renewal. This is in-
formation  that  members  not  only  expect,  but  for  which  they  have  paid  NAR,  state 
and  local  associations  dues  to  receive.  Once  again,  many  of  these  faxes  will  meet 
the definition of unsolicited fax advertisements and could not be sent under the new 
FCC rules. 
The Feasibility of FCC-Suggested Means of Obtaining Permission 

The  FCC  has  argued  that  obtaining  written  permission  is  not  a  difficult  thing  to 
do. We disagree. A close examination of the methods proposed by the FCC for busi-
ness  to  obtain  consent—‘‘direct  mail,  websites  and  interaction  with  their  customers 
in  their  stores’’—points  out  the  hurdles  unanticipated  by  the  FCC  that  will  be  en-
countered by the real estate professional. 

Face-to-Face Meetings. As our previous examples indicate, face-to-face meetings 
are  not  the  norm  and  are  sometimes  impracticable  prior  to  the  need/desire  to  fax. 
Unlike  the  corner  grocery  or  neighborhood  restaurant,  consumers  do  not  regularly 
visit  their  local  real  estate  firms’  offices.  (Most  consumers  engage  in  a  real  estate 
transaction  every  7  years.)  Consequently,  most  real  estate  practitioners  will  not 
have  a  consumer’s  permission  to  fax  on  file  when  a  request  for  information  is  re-
ceived. 

A face-to-face meeting will require a special trip that takes time and incurs some 
travel  expenses.  At  a  minimum,  these  costs  will  increase  the  cost  of  a  transaction 
that will be absorbed by the agent, real estate firm or consumer. At its worst, a face-
to-face  meeting  will  be  impossible,  e.g.  where  an  owner  lives  out  of  the  area  as  is 
commonly the case in a resort market or when property is inherited. 

Courier.  A  permission  form  could  be  hand-delivered  to  a  potential  fax  recipient 
via courier or messenger service. This is an expensive means of delivery and would 
be  impracticable  from  a  cost  perspective  for  all  but  a  very  small  number  of  trans-
actions  or  those  transactions  with  an  assured  outcome.  Real  estate  professionals 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

16

commonly respond to large numbers of customer requests for information—only one 
in  twelve  contacts  eventually  results  in  a  home  sale  and  compensation.  Delivering 
and  collecting  permission  via  courier  or  messenger  would  be  cost  prohibitive  for 
most real estate practitioners. 

Mail/Overnight  Delivery.  Using  an  overnight  service  will  have  the  same  cost 
drawbacks as a courier service. Both regular and overnight mail will suffer from the 
additional  problem  that  an  interested  customer  will  have  to  wait  24  hours  or  more 
before the information that they requested can be delivered. In our ‘‘instant gratifi-
cation’’  world—and  an  industry  where  quick  customer  service  can  be  the  difference 
between gaining a new customer or not—the inherent delayed delivery of materials 
would make this a very unattractive approach. 

Internet/E-Mail/Electronic Signature. Despite the rapid adoption of the Inter-
net  and  e-mail,  there  are  still  significant  numbers  of  households—including  under-
served minority, immigrant and low-income populations, etc.—with limited or no ac-
cess to the Internet, e-mail or the technology which would allow them to access, let 
alone sign, an electronic document. Additionally, not all states have enacted legisla-
tion that allows for the electronic signature of documents. Electronic delivery, there-
fore,  is  seriously  limited  in  those  markets  where  real  estate  professionals  serve  a 
population  with  limited  access  to  this  means  of  access  or  without  the  appropriate 
state enabling legislation. 

Fax.  We  would  point  out  that  faxing  a  permission  form  to  a  consumer  would  be 
a quick and inexpensive way to disseminate the form and receive permission. How-
ever, in discussions held with the FCC staff on this matter and in its written guid-
ance,  the  FCC  has  indicated  that  faxing  a  permission  form  would  not  be  allowed 
since  the  form  itself  could  be  construed  as  a  solicitation  or  advertisement. 3 Like-
wise,  a  faxed  permission  form  with  a  signature  would  not  provide  the  necessary 
written  permission  because  the  signature  is  not  considered  a  valid,  original  signa-
ture in some jurisdictions. 

Faxes  have  been  used  by  the  real  estate  industry  to  deliver  information  to  con-
sumers  and  other  real  estate  professionals  because  of  (1)  the  speed  of  delivery  and 
(2)  the  minimal  cost  associated  with  that  speedy  transmission.  While  it  is  possible 
to  use  one  of  the  FCC  recommended  means  to  obtain  written  permission,  doing  so 
will  result  in  delay,  increased  costs  and  the  very  real  possibility  that  the  window 
of  opportunity  to  purchase  a  given  property  will  be  lost.  It  is  hard  to  imagine  that 
these  new  rules  will  not  impede  the  ability  of  real  estate  professionals  to  quickly 
and efficiently help homebuyers and seller complete a real estate transaction. 
The Magnitude of the Resources Needed for Compliance Purposes 

While the cost of obtaining a signed permission in any one instance may not seem 
significant,  in  the  aggregate,  the  magnitude  of  the  new  paperwork  required  to  ob-
tain written permission and the cost of delivery (e.g. courier, overnight, or mail) re-
quired by the new rules are sizable. For example, if the new rules had been in place 
for  2004,  NAR  estimates  that  roughly  66  million  permission  forms  would  have  to 
be printed, circulated, processed and stored in the first year by the real estate sales 
industry  in  order  to  comply  with  the  new  written  permission  requirements.  This 
total breaks down as follows: 

Agent to a Consumer. Last year, approximately 6 million homes changed hands. 
If  we  make  a  conservative  assumption  that  each  seller  requested  information  from 
two  potential  listing  agents  that  would  typically  be  faxed  today  and  each  buyer  re-
ceived two faxes from two different agents during their home search that were sub-
ject to the new rules, then approximately 24 million faxes would have been sent and 
24  million  signed  permission  forms  would  have  been  required  before  those  faxes 
could be sent. Those 24 million permission forms would have to be printed, delivered 
to the consumer by some means at a cost, returned to the agent also at a cost, filed 
and stored. 

This  estimate  does  not  account  for  the  fact  that  many  families  shop  for  a  new 
home  each  year  without  purchasing  a  home.  Consequently,  the  estimate  of  24  mil-
lion permissions required is a significant underestimate of the volume of permission 
forms that would in fact be generated by the industry acting to comply with the new 
rules. 

Agent  to  Agent/Real  Estate  Firms.  According  to  our  surveys,  faxes  are  typi-
cally used by real estate professionals to advertise open houses, announce new prop-
erty listings and changes in asking prices for listed homes. To estimate the number 
of  permissions  needed  to  facilitate  faxes  for  these  purposes,  we  can  conservatively 
assume that each of our 1.2 million, self-employed members will want to fax, at one 
time or another, to at least ten real estate firms/offices, ten individual agents home 

3 2003 Report and Order, ¶ 191. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

17

offices, five settlement service providers and five general business service providers. 
Thirty million six hundred thousand permissions, therefore, would need to be gath-
ered  to  allow  for  unfettered  faxing  between  real  estate  professionals  and  the  other 
real estate professionals and firms with which they work. 

Given that the real estate sales population changes significantly from year to year 
as  new  agents  enter  the  industry,  others  leave  the  business,  and  fax  numbers  are 
changed  and  added,  the  need  to  seek  permissions  will  be  an  ongoing  yearly  effort. 
Consequently, the 30.6 million estimate will be a first year figure that will be added 
to  each  year  as  new  permissions  are  needed  to  stay  current  of  all  the  changes  that 
have ensued. 

Real  Estate  Firms  to  Agents/Other  Firms.  In  addition,  the  Nation’s  93,000 
real  estate  firms,  as  legal  entities  distinct  from  their  independent  contractor  agent 
sales  force,  would  also  need  to  obtain  permission  to  fax  to  real  estate  professionals 
and other firms. Assuming that each firm will have the need to fax to ten other real 
estate  firms,  thirty  agents,  twenty  settlement  service  providers  and  twenty  other 
general  business  service  firms,  the  number  of  permissions  required  to  support  the 
current  level  of  fax  activity  that  is  accepted  as  common  practice  would  total 
7,440,000.  Again,  this  figure  is  a  first  year  estimate  that  will  need  constant  updat-
ing to account for changes in the industry players and fax numbers. 

REALTOR  Association to Member.  In  order  for  NAR  and  its  state  and  local 
associations  to  continue  to  fax  their  1.2  million  members,  an  additional  3,600,000 
signed  written  permission  forms  would  be  generated.  REALTORS  do  not  join  just 
the  national  association  but  join  their  state  associations  as  well  as  their  local  asso-
ciations. Hence, the need for 3.6 million separate permission forms to be circulated, 
complied,  maintained  and  checked  prior  to  any  communications  via  fax  would  be 
created.  We  would  anticipate  that  this  would  be  an  annual  exercise  in  which  each 
of our associations would engage. 

A Final Thought. It is important to recognize that each of the forgoing estimates 
of  numbers  of  permissions  to  fax  that  would  be  required  to  comply  with  the  FCC’s 
new fax rules are only one part of the cost equation. We have not attempted to esti-
mate the dollar cost of obtaining each of these permissions and maintaining the re-
sulting  records  since  to  do  so  would  require  a  level  of  detail  that  we  do  not  have 
available to us. However, it is clear that given the shear magnitude of the numbers 
involved and the costs of preparation, distribution, and management of the resulting 
paperwork that the costs will be substantial. 
Compliance Cost vs. Benefits Achieved 

As  we  have  illustrated,  the  costs  associated  with  the  elimination  of  the  EBR  and 
alternative  means  of  granting  permission  to  fax  are  enormous.  This  new  burden  is 
created despite the fact that the Commission’s do-not-fax rules have worked for over 
a decade. In reversing the 1992 decision, the Commission did not note any consumer 
complaints  that  were  a  result  of  the  established  business  relationship  rule.  Indeed, 
there is scant evidence of harm to justify the Commission’s abrupt change. 

Though  there  is  not  evidence  of  harm  that  needed  to  be  fixed  by  eliminating  the 
EBR  exception  or  alternative  means  of  giving  permission  to  fax,  there  is  evidence 
of  over  10  years  of  business  expectations  in  reliance  on  that  exception.  NAR,  real 
estate  professionals,  and  entities  in  countless  other  industries  implemented  a  prac-
tice of routinely faxing information regarding products and services to other entities 
with which they have an established business relationship. 

Accordingly,  while  the  compliance  costs  of  the  new  rule  in  the  aggregate  would 
be quite high, the benefits would be minimal. The faxes sent by and received by real 
estate  agents  are  faxes  which  facilitate  a  business  transaction.  These  are  not  the 
type of ‘‘junk’’ faxes that the TCPA and Commission rule were designed to prohibit. 
But the Commissions’ revised rule for the first time covers all faxes, including those 
integral to existing and new business relationships in the real estate market. 
A Solution to the Problems Created by the New Fax Rules 

NAR  believes  that  the  established  business  relationship  exception  to  the  TCPA 

rules should be reestablished and that other forms of consent should be allowed. 

In  the  matter  of  the  EBR  exception,  NAR  believes  that  the  Commission  correctly 
analyzed  consumer  expectations  and  the  affect  privacy  interests  in  its  1992  rule-
making:  ‘‘a  solicitation  to  someone  with  whom  a  prior  business  relationship  exists 
does  not  adversely  affect  subscriber  privacy  interests.’’ 4 Also,  the  Commission  pru-

4 1992 Report and Order, In the Matter of Rules and Regulations Implementing the Telephone 
Consumer  Protection  Act  of  1991,  7  FCC  Rcd  8752,  ¶ 34  (rel.  Oct.  16,  1992)(CC  Docket  No.  92–
90) (‘‘1992 Report’’) 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

18

dently found that the standards for a telephone solicitation and faxed advertisement 
should be the same and thus exempted established business relationships from both 
sets of rules. 

With  respect  to  the  allowance  for  means  of  permission  beyond  express  written 

permission, NAR believes that consent should be allowed that is:

• faxed;
• provided  electronically  (whether  by  a  web-based  ‘‘click-through’’:  or  in  an  e-

mail);

• orally (in person, by telephone, or in a telephone message); or
• by automated means (in response to an automated fax-on-demand phone system 

by which the caller can request faxed information).

Written  signed  consent  is  unnecessary  and  imposes  a  requirement  far  out  of  pro-
portion to the harm it seeks to address, and thus contradicts the intent of Congress 
in  adopting  the  TCPA.  The  legislative  history  shows  that  Congress  considered  im-
posing  a  written  requirement  and  decided  against  that  high  threshold  of  consent. 
The House Report accompanying the TCPA states that Congress ‘‘did not see a com-
pelling  need  for  consent  to  be  in  written  form.  Requiring  written  consent  would,  in 
the  Committee’s  view,  unreasonably  restrict  the  subscriber’s  rights  to  accept  solici-
tations  of  interest  and  unfairly  expose  businesses  to  unwarranted  risk  from  accept-
ing permissions or invitations from subscribers.’’ 5 

The  Senate  Report  is  equally  on  point.  The  Senate  bill  as  introduced  contained 
the  phase  ‘‘express  written  consent’’  in  the  context  of  telemarketing,  but  dropping 
the requirement that consent be written was one of three changes the Senate Com-
mittee made before favorably reporting the bill. The Committee justified its decision 
to drop the written requirement because the Committee found that mandatory writ-
ten consent was ill-suited to the interests of consumers and sellers. 6 

A written consent requirement also is contrary to the Commission’s telemarketing 
rules.  Those  regulations  exclude  from  the  definition  of  a  telephone  solicitation  any 
call  concerning  the  sale  of  goods  or  services  in  response  to  an  individual’s  inquiry, 
when the individual would be expecting such a call. 7 In contrast, the fax advertising 
rules not only specify that a fax sent in the same situation is an ‘‘unsolicited adver-
tisement,’’ but actually prohibit such a fax. 

This is problematic for two reasons. First, classifying a telephone call made in re-
sponse  to  an  inquiry  as  not  a  solicitation,  but  a  fax  sent  in  exactly  the  same  cir-
cumstances  as  an  unsolicited  advertisement  is  confusing,  contradictory,  and  arbi-
trary  since  the  terms  ‘‘solicitation’’  and  ‘‘advertisement’’  have  the  same  meaning. 
This  is  particularly  the  case  since,  under  the  plain  meaning  of  the  term,  a  fax  is 
not  unsolicited  if  the  recipient  has  made  a  request  for  the  information  and  there 
are  numerous  other  ways  to  invite  or  permit  a  fax  other  than  by  providing  prior 
written and signed consent. 
Conclusion 

In  conclusion,  we  want  to  thank  the  leadership  of  the  Commerce  Committee  for 
the  opportunity  to  share  the  views  of  the  National  Association  of  REALTORS  on 
the need for Congressional attention to the problems faced by the real estate indus-
try  as  the  result  of  the  new  fax  regulations  that  will  take  effect  January  1,  2005. 
We strongly believe that consumers looking for new homes and rental units will be 
disadvantaged  by  the  new  regime  as  will  real  estate  professionals  and  firms.  We 
urge you to take action to create the statutory authority for an established business 
relationship  exception  needed  by  the  FCC  to  allow  the  EBR  exception  that  has 
served consumers and businesses well for over a decade and clarify once again that 
permission  can  and  should  be  allowed  to  be  granted  by  means  other  than  express 
written permission.

Senator SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Feeken. 
Steven Kirsch? 

5 H.R.  102–317,  at  13  (1991).  Though  this  statement  was  made  in  the  context  of  telephone 

solicitations, the same rationale applies equally to the fax context. 

6 S.R. 102–178, at 5 (1991). 
7 2003 Report and Order ¶ 114. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

19

STATEMENT OF STEVEN T. KIRSCH, FOUNDER/CHAIRMAN, 

PROPEL SOFTWARE CORPORATION 

Mr. KIRSCH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for allowing me to speak 
with the Committee on my perspective on this very important piece 
of legislation. 

I’m here representing the people who hate junk faxes, and there 
are over 200 million of us. There’s only one real point of contention 
here, and that’s whether to add an EBR exemption to the junk fax 
statute.  The  other  witnesses  have  testified  on  the  written  consent 
issues,  and  we  totally  agree,  that’s  not  a  problem,  we  should  do 
that. But I’m here to talk about that EBR. And I’d like to give you 
compelling  evidence,  contrary  to  what  you’ve  heard  from  others, 
that  adding  an  EBR  exemption  for  junk  faxes  is  something  that 
should  not,  and  must  not,  be  done;  not  for  my  sake,  but  for  every-
one’s  sake,  including  the  sponsors  and  including  the  gentlemen 
here. 

For  example,  I  get  a  ton  of  unwanted  junk  mail  in  my  mailbox 
every day from companies I’ve done business with in the past. You 
probably do, too. You know, suppose you write a law that forced me 
to  pay  both  postage  and  printing  costs  for  this  advertising  until 
such  time  as  I  notified  each  one  of  these  businesses  to  stop?  That 
way,  all  of  these  businesses  could  send  me  stuff  that  I  don’t  want 
at  virtually  no  cost  to  them,  and  force  me  to  pay  for  it  until  such 
time as I got mad enough to write them each a letter to stop. How 
many  of  you  would  vote  for  such  a  bill?  Well,  I  hope  that  nobody 
would, but that’s exactly what you’re being asked to do here today. 
Never  before  in  the  history  of  this  country  has  it  been  legal  to 
use another man’s printing press and ink to print your advertising 
at  the  other  man’s  expense  and  without  his  permission.  But  that 
is exactly what this bill proposes to do. 

The  sponsors  have  proposed  putting  the  EBR  exception,  ‘‘back 
into  the  TCPA’’  in  order  to,  ‘‘restore  the  status  quo,’’  and,  ‘‘avoid  a 
harsh  impact  on  business  communication  without  providing  any 
tangible  benefit  to  consumers.’’  That’s  plain  nonsense.  It’s  utterly 
false.  And  the  facts  unambiguously  show  that  exactly  the  opposite 
is  true.  An  EBR  exemption  is  completely  unnecessary.  And  if  you 
do put an EBR exemption in, you will impose a harsh impact with-
out any benefit. 

The  facts  and  the  record  show  the  following.  Number  1,  there 
never  was,  and  there  never  has  been,  an  EBR  exemption  for  junk 
faxes. The EBR was deliberately removed from the TCPA before its 
passage  in  1991.  Number  2,  there  are  no  court  cases  that  I’m 
aware of that have determined that there ever was a legal EBR ex-
emption.  Number  3,  it’s  an  undisputed  fact  that  there  never  was, 
and  never  has  been,  an  FCC  regulation  authorizing  EBR  for  junk 
faxes.  It’s  simply  ain’t  there,  folks.  It’s  a  matter  of  public  record. 
There  is  no  evidence  that  the  TCPA,  which  never  had  an  EBR, 
is  not  working  well.  This  was  admitted  by  the  Fax  Ban  Coalition 
and  in  the  testimony  of  NAR  given  today.  For  example,  NAR  has 
over one million members. They admit that they fax their members 
all the time. Their members fax other members. Their members fax 
their  clients.  Yet  there  are  no  known  cases  of  the  NAR  or  a  real-
estate  agent  having  been  sued  for  any  legitimate  business-related 
faxes. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

20

So your primary witnesses, the country’s leading trade organiza-
tion,  which  extensively  uses  faxes,  is  telling  you  it  hasn’t  been  a 
problem.  It’s  only  the  written  part  that’s  been  a  problem.  So  if  it 
hasn’t  been  a  problem,  why  do  we  need  to  fix  it?  In  fact,  we  know 
the EBR exemption has never been necessary for the smooth func-
tioning of business, because it’s been there for 14 years, and nobody 
ever  complained.  In  fact,  hardly  anybody  even  noticed.  Further-
more,  there’s  not  a  single  company  in  the  world  that  requires  an 
EBR exemption to do legitimate business. Can you name one? 

The only use of an EBR exemption is to allow advertisers to send 
junk  mail  that  people  don’t  ask  for.  For  example,  NFIB  has  never 
been  sued  for  sending  legislative  updates  to  their  members  by  fax. 
That’s why their members joined. But then NFIB faxed a five-page 
unsolicited  ad  to  sell  insurance  to  their  members,  they  were  sued, 
and they had to pay a whole $575 fee. The court said, in no uncer-
tain  terms,  that  there  was  no  EBR  for  faxes.  NFIB  broke  the  law, 
because they broke their covenant with their members, who wanted 
legislative updates and not advertising. They can still fax their leg-
islative  updates  to  their  members.  That  has  never  been  regulated 
under the TCPA. Mr. Bladine’s communications have not been reg-
ulated.  Mr.  Feeken,  his—faxing  of  his  presentation  would  not  be 
permitted? That’s not true. It’s not even regulated under the TCPA. 
The  point  is—I  mean,  they  just  can’t  send  ads  by  fax  without  ask-
ing first. It’s simply good business practice. And it’s also something 
that’s very easy to do. 

Let me give you another scenario. I can call a RE/MAX realty of-
fice  and  ask  for  information  on  listings  and  other  services.  That 
creates  an  EBR  with  me  and  RE/MAX.  If  this  bill  passes,  I  would 
legally  be  able  to  send  junk  faxes  to  every  RE/MAX  fax  machine 
in the country advertising my anti-spam products, or anything else, 
for  that  matter.  And  I’d  do  so  until  each  individual  RE/MAX  office 
tells  me  to  stop.  That’s  not  cost  free.  That’s  not  opt  out  at  no  cost. 
There’s a lot of effort involved in opting out. That is what this EBR 
exemption in this bill will permit. 

In  addition,  if  you  institute  an  EBR  you’re  going  to  cause  every-
one a lot of work for no benefit, and you’re going to open the flood 
gates  for  adverse  consequences.  I’ve  surveyed  many  people,  and 
every  single  one  of  them  would  opt  out  of  virtually  all  unsolicited 
advertising sent to them by fax, whether it is from businesses they 
know  or  don’t  know.  And  I  would  encourage  you  all  to  go  do  the 
survey yourself. Why force everyone to jump through a hoop to get 
rid of something that they never wanted in the first place? I mean, 
why force businesses to have to create 800-numbers and data bases 
and all those opt-outs that they don’t have to do today? What’s the 
point of that? 

In conclusion, everyone agrees that TCPA has generally been an 
extremely  fine  piece  of  legislation,  because  it  succeeded  in  striking 
a  reasonable  balance  between  the  wanted  content  and  allowing 
that,  or  restricting  the  unwanted  content.  We  all  recognize  the 
need  to  relax  the  in-writing  requirement  that  the  FCC  has  at-
tempted to add to the regulations, and I agree with my fellow wit-
nesses  here,  but  there  is  no  need  for  a  new  EBR  exemption  to  be 
added.  Any  changes  that  you  do  to  the  TCPA  should  be  done  very 
carefully,  and  only  if  they’re  absolutely  necessary.  No  company  in 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

21

the  world  needs  an  EBR  exemption  to  send  legitimate  faxes  to  do 
business;  however,  it  is  reasonable,  but  it  is  not  required,  to  add 
a  special  opt-out  for  membership  organizations  to  send  faxes  to 
their members. And I have suggested suitable language in my writ-
ten comments. 

Thank you, and I would be delighted to take any questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Kirsch follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF STEVEN T. KIRSCH, FOUNDER/CHAIRMAN, PROPEL 

SOFTWARE CORPORATION 

Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman  for  allowing  me  to  speak  with  the  Committee  on  my 

perspective on this very important piece of legislation. 

Everyone  recognizes  the  need  for  legitimate  businesses  to  send  legitimate  busi-
ness communications to their customers without fear of being sued. With recent con-
templated  rule  changes  by  the  FCC,  this  ability  has  been  placed  in  jeopardy  and 
needs to be fixed. 

This  bill  seeks  to  solve  that  problem  by  doing  two  things:  (1)  clarifying  that  per-
mission  to  send  unsolicited  advertisements  can  be  granted  verbally  and  (2)  adding 
a new exemption to the law to allow businesses that I have an Established Business 
Relationship (EBR) with to send me junk faxes without my consent until I tell them 
to stop. 

The first thing is an excellent solution. The second is not. 
Unfortunately,  adding  an  EBR  exemption,  while  well  intentioned  and  while  solv-
ing one aspect of the problem, is completely unnecessary. It will actually hurt legiti-
mate  use  of  the  fax  machine  for  businesses  because  as  written,  the  bill  is  so  broad 
that  it  permits  fax  advertising  practices  that  legitimate  businesses  don’t  use  and 
thus  permits  abuses  that  will  make  legitimate  faxes  less  useful  the  way  spam  e-
mail  makes  legitimate  e-mail  less  attractive.  It  creates  a  whole  host  of  new  prob-
lems  and  adds  new  burdens  and  costs.  It’s  like  ‘‘whack-a-mole’’. . . solve  one  prob-
lem,  create  10  or  20  more.  Congress  has  better  things  to  do  than  solve  the  same 
problem over and over and over again. 

A better approach is simply to clarify the terms in the TCPA to reflect the original 
intent  and  current  business  practice.  This  solves  the  problem  and  restores  the  sta-
tus quo without imposing new burdens or introducing any unintended consequences. 
Adding a new EBR Exemption Solves one Problem but Creates Many More 
Contrary to popular belief, there has never been an EBR exemption to the TCPA. 
Although  the  FCC  did  erroneously  interpret  the  law  this  way,  the  courts  have 
never  adopted  this  interpretation  and  Congress  never  intended  such  an  exemption. 
Since the enactment of the TCPA, I have not been able to locate a single court case 
where such an exemption has been upheld. In addition, businesses have been acting 
consistent with Congress’ intent and the court’s interpretation as well. For example, 
there  is  not  a  single  public  company  that  I  am  aware  of  that  sends  junk  faxes  to 
their  customer  base.  And  there  is  certainly  no  company  in  the  United  States  that 
needs  to  have  an  EBR  exemption  to  send  junk  faxes  in  order  to  conduct  business. 
Therefore,  adding  a  new  EBR  exemption  to  the  TCPA  as  currently  proposed  in 
this bill, is not only completely unnecessary, but it is also counterproductive for the 
following reasons:

able amount. NOBODY I know wants to get more junk faxes.

• It would dramatically increase the amount of junk faxes I get by an unpredict-
• It would increase my costs since I would bear the cost having to opt out of each 
and every junk fax and keep records and receipts of each request. In short, Con-
gress would be imposing a huge, unwanted cost burden on all recipients of this 
advertising. All the recipients would be forced to incur costs for something that 
they never wanted in the first place.
• It  would  also  increase  the  burden  on  every  sender  who  would  then  be  respon-
sible  for  setting  up  a  toll  free  opt  out  number  and  keeping  track  of  all  opt  out 
requests.  The  record  keeping  burden  of  the  advertiser  would  actually  increase 
under this proposal as the sender would now have to track both opt in and opt 
out requests.
• It  would  increase  the  legal  liability  of  the  sender  since  the  database  of  opt  out 
numbers  would  be  close  to  100  times  larger  than  having  to  maintain  an  opt  in 
database.  Any  typo,  omission,  or  mistake  in  the  opt  out  database  required  by 
this law could generate a lawsuit. So lawsuits against businesses are 100 times 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

22

more  likely  under  the  opt  out  rules  required  by  this  legislation.  That’s  not  a 
guess; it’s a mathematical certainty.
• It opens up the door for legalized abuse via the ‘‘unintentional EBR’’ that I de-
scribe below creating an unpredictable torrent of junk faxes that would then be 
legal but completely unexpected and unwanted.
• I’ve  surveyed  many  people  chosen  at  random  and  every  single  one  of  them 
would  opt-out  of  virtually  all  unsolicited  advertising,  whether  it  is  from  busi-
nesses they know or do not know.

The  bottom  line  is  this:  adding  a  new  EBR  exemption  to  the  TCPA  would  create 
needless  amounts  of  work  for  both  sender  and  recipient,  impose  new  costs  on  the 
recipients  without  their  consent,  and  accomplish  NOTHING  of  any  economic  value. 

Huge burden on everyone, no value. What’s the point of that? 
But there is a better way. 

A Better Approach: Clarify the Original Intent 

I  spoke  with  Jeb  Bladine  who  is  testifying  here  today.  In  the  30  years  he’s  been 
in business, his firm has never been sued for the business communications he’s sent 
via  fax.  Nor  is  he  aware  of  anyone  in  his  local  community  that  has  been  sued  for 
sending  junk  faxes.  They  all  use  faxes  responsibly  and  the  existing  law  has 
worked for them as written and interpreted by the courts.

Because the law has been working to everyone’s satisfaction until the recent rule 
changes,  it  is  clear  that  the  best  way  to  fix  the  problem  without  introducing  new 
ones  is  to  clarify  the  existing  law  as  it  has  been  interpreted  by  the  courts  over  the 
last 14 years since the TCPA was enacted. 

The best way to restore the status quo is by doing two simple things:
• Clarify that permission does not need to be in writing.
• Modify  the  definition  of  ‘‘unsolicited  advertisement’’  so  that  all  requested  busi-

ness communications are clearly permitted.

Normal request-response business communication then works as expected without 
fear  of  litigation.  All  such  communication,  such  as  asking  your  favorite  restaurant 
to  fax  a  menu  or  asking  your  real  estate  agent  to  send  you  house  information,  a 
purchase  contract,  or  counter-offer,  etc.,  would  be  exempt.  These  are  normal  busi-
ness  communications  where  the  recipient  has  requested  the  material  being  trans-
mitted  and  should  not  be  considered  ‘‘unsolicited  advertisements’’  that  should  be 
regulated by the TCPA. 

Even if no records of the request whatsoever are kept by the sender, the very na-
ture  of  the  material  being  sent  and  the  number  of  telephone  calls  made  to  fax  ma-
chines  by  the  sender  are  evidence  that  would  provide  an  affirmative  defense  avail-
able to any business that might be sued by an unscrupulous recipient. For example, 
a  restaurant  that  faxes  an  occasional  menu  to  people  who  call  in  requesting  it  is 
a  legitimate  purpose.  It  is  far  different  than  a  restaurant  who  blindly  sends  out 
their menu to every fax number in the local Chamber of Commerce directory. 

In  short,  judges  determine  whether  the  material  in  question  constitutes  an  unso-
licited advertisement or legitimate business communication by looking at a number 
of factors in order to determine whether express consent was given or not:

• examination of the material being faxed, 
• the past behavior of the sender (including phone records), 
• the nature of the relationship between the sender and the recipient.
Non-profit  membership  organizations  such  as  the  National  Federation  of  Inde-
pendent  Businesses  (NFIB)  or  the  local  Chamber  of  Commerce  can  still  commu-
nicate  by  fax  with  their  members  under  this  proposal.  They  should  just  include  a 
statement  in  their  membership  forms  that  by  joining  and  providing  your  fax  num-
ber,  that  you  are  allowing  broadcast  communications  related  to  the  organization  to 
be  sent  to  you  via  fax.  Or  even  better,  they  could  have  a  check  box  as  to  whether 
the member wants to receive official communications by fax, e-mail, etc. This is sim-
ply good business practice and any legitimate business already does this. 
Further Protections 

If  Congress  wishes  to  further  protect  the  fax  communications  of  non-profit  busi-
ness  to  communicate  with  their  membership,  then  it  is  reasonable  to  authorize  the 
FCC  to  add  a  special  carve  out  for  non-profit  membership  organizations  commu-
nicating to their membership based on subjects that are consistent with the mission 
of the organization, e.g., the Chamber of Commerce could fax a notice about a small 
business  seminar  the  Chamber  is  putting  on,  but  could  not  fax  discount  coupons  to 
the local cash wash to members without their consent. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

23

Another  important  change  to  protect  recipients  would  be  to  require  that  profes-
sional ‘‘fax broadcasting’’ companies always identify themselves on the fax regard-
less  of  whether  they  have  a  high  level  of  involvement  or  not  in  the  sending  of  the 
fax.  This  would  expose  the  identity  of  a  small  handful  of  illegal  fax  broadcasters 
who are responsible for a large portion of the junk faxes sent today. 
Summary 

Because the recipient bears the brunt of the costs on a fax transmission, fax ma-
chines  always  have  to  be  a  request/response  mechanism  for  business  communica-
tions,  not  a  low-cost  mass  advertising  medium  for  businesses.  We  need  to  keep  it 
that way. 

The  proposed  clarifications  to  the  definitions  would  maintain  the  status  quo;  en-
suring  that  legitimate  communications  are  protected  without  opening  the  door  to 
abuse. That benefits everyone: consumers, big business, and small business, wheth-
er they are recipients or senders. 

If these clarifications are not acceptable, a widely accepted alternative is for Con-
gress  to  remove  the  written  permission  requirements  and  order  the  GAO  study. 
That  way,  any  additional  changes  can  be  reviewed  with  the  benefit  of  the  GAO 
study results for guidance. 

The following sections provide more detail to the concepts presented above. 
Adding a New EBR Exemption to the TCPA Would Be Unprecedented 

When  the  original  TCPA  was  debated  in  1989,  unsolicited  faxes  were  recognized 
as the equivalent of ‘‘getting junk mail with the postage due’’—except that you have 
no  chance  to  decline  the  charges.  Telemarketing  Practices:  Hearings  on  H.R.  628, 
2131, and 2184 Before the Subcommittee on Telecommunications and Finance of the 
House Committee on Energy and Commerce, 101st Congress, 1st Session (1989) Sup. 
Docs. No. Y4.En2/3:101–43 (U.S. Government Printing Office). Unsolicited faxes are 
no  different  that  using  another  man’s  printing  press  and  ink  to  print  your  adver-
tising,  at  the  other  man’s  expense  and  without  his  permission.  This  conduct  has 
never been legal—even before the TCPA was enacted, common law cases recognized 
this  as  trespass  to  chattels  and  some  brave  souls  actually  brought  junk  faxers  to 
court  and  won.  See  Fax  Weighed,  22  Cents  Won  in  ‘‘Junk  Mail’’  Suit,  L.A.  Times, 
July 4, 1991, p. 4. 

Let me give you an example. I get a ton of unwanted mail every day from compa-

nies I’ve done business with in the past. How about you? 

Suppose we create a law that forced recipients to pay both postage and printing 
costs for this advertising until such time as they notified each business to stop send-
ing the ads? That way, all of these businesses could send me stuff that I don’t want 
at virtually no cost to them and force me to pay for it. How many of you would vote 
for such a bill? 

I hope no one would. 
And  ironically,  the  same  business  that  would  love  to  do  that  to  their  customers 
would  oppose  having  their  customers  do  it  back  to  them!  In  short,  it’d  be  great  if 
I could do it to others, but I’d sure hate it if someone did it to me. 

Let  me  ask  you  another  question.  How  about  we  pass  a  law  that  would  permit 
these  same  business  to  send  me  all  this  stuff  that  I  now  get  in  the  mail  to  my  fax 
machine? 

Businesses would LOVE that because it would reduce their advertising costs. Vir-
tually  every  single  one  of  these  pieces  could  be  sent  via  fax  at  a  much  lower  cost 
than  mailing  it  because  faxing  shifts  virtually  all  of  the  costs  of  the  advertising  on 
to the recipient. 

Should  we  do  that?  Should  we  legalize  it  so  advertisers  can  send  you  ads  you 

never asked for at your expense until you tell them to stop? 

I  don’t  think  you  should.  But  that’s  exactly  what  you’re  being  asked  to  do  here! 
It  would  be  like  telling  Mr.  Bladine  that  anyone  who  calls  his  newspaper  is  enti-
tled  to  a  full  page  ad  in  his  paper  for  free,  until  he  explicitly  asks  them  to  stop. 
Some  people  dismiss  junk  faxes  as  a  de  minimus  part  of  owning  a  fax  machine. 
But ask yourself who is more harmful to society—a man who steals one dollar from 
a  million  people,  or  a  man  who  steals  a  million  dollars  from  one  person?  In  both 
cases a million dollars is stolen. But the former miscreant is more harmful because 
he can fly under the radar and the million dollars is never recovered because it isn’t 
worth it to any single victim. That’s true with junk faxes. According to experts and 
published reports, there are over 2 billion junk faxes sent each year and that num-
ber is growing. That practice steals hundreds of millions of dollars from American’s 
pockets—a few cents at a time. 

In  1991,  Congress  considered  and  explicitly  rejected  allowing  a  business  to  send 
faxes to someone with whom it had an ‘‘established business relationship.’’ The FCC 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

24

admits  that  it  was  in  error  in  1995  to  pencil  back  in  what  Congress  took  out,  and 
now has taken steps to correct that error. 

Before  rushing  to  do  this  however,  we  must  remember—you  are  creating  a  legal 
right for one person to use another person’s property and to take the other person’s 
paper  and  ink  for  their  own  use,  all  without  consent.  No  one  would  argue  that  a 
merchant  has  the  right  to  come  into  my  house  or  office  (at  any  time  of  the  day  or 
night), drop off an advertisement, and take three to forty cents off of my night stand 
in order to offset his advertising costs. Yet that is precisely what you will do if you 
create any exemptions to the junk fax prohibitions in the TCPA. 

So  even  if  we  disagree  in  the  details  or  scope  of  any  exemptions  to  be  added  to 
the  TCPA,  we  all  have  to  agree  that  because  we  are  shifting  the  costs  for  billions 
of  unsolicited  faxes  onto  recipients,  we  must  craft  such  exemptions  carefully  and 
conservatively. 

Several  portions  of  this  bill  are  not  controversial.  The  annual  report  and  GAO 
study  are  certainly  in  that  category.  Relaxing  the  FCC’s  proposed  new  rule  requir-
ing  express  consent  for  junk  faxes  to  be  in  writing  is  also  not  controversial.  The 
sticking  point  is  whether  or  not  to  create  an  exemption  in  the  statute  for  anyone 
you  have  an  ‘‘established  business  relationship’’  with  to  send  you  junk  faxes  until 
you tell them to stop. 

There  is  only  one  major  point  of  contention  on  this  bill:  whether  or  not  to  add 
new language to the TCPA to allow any business that you have a relationship with 
to  send  advertising  to  your  fax  machine  without  your  consent  until  you  tell  them 
to stop. 

I’d  like  to  explain  why  this  is  a  bad  idea  and  suggest  a  more  appropriate  alter-
native that accomplishes all the stated objectives of the author and sponsors of this 
bill and does so without any unintended consequences. 
The ‘‘Unintentional EBR’’

I’d like to give you two examples. Suppose Joe’s Office Supply decides to take it’s 
in-house customer list, and for those customers who have provided Joe a fax number 
and bought something in the last year Joe wants to send them an advertising flyer 
by fax. Now suppose Bill’s Office Supply wants to send advertising faxes, so he buys 
the list of local fax numbers from the Chamber of Commerce and sends out fax ads. 
In this example, I have received both faxes, and in the past, I have bought some-
thing  from  both  Bill  and  Joe.  But  I  gave  Joe  my  fax  numbers,  and  intentionally 
withheld it from Bill since I suspected he might misuse it. What Joe did, was what 
I think most people think of when they talk about sending fax ads within an ‘‘estab-
lished business relationship’’ exemption. That is an example of a ‘‘legitimate’’ estab-
lished business relationship fax. But Bill’s example is not. No one thinks that indis-
criminate  junk  faxing  should  be  permitted  or  rewarded.  Yet  in  the  above  example, 
using  the  language  of  the  bill  as  it  stands  today,  the  indiscriminate  junk  fax  I  re-
ceived  from  Bill,  at  a  fax  number  I  did  not  give  to  Bill,  will  be  exempted  from  the 
statute.  How  do  we  create  an  ‘‘established  business  relationship’’  exemption  for  ‘‘le-
gitimate’’ fax uses, but not create a loophole for exploiting by illegitimate uses? 

This  problem  is  exacerbated  by  how  broadly  the  term  ‘‘established  business  rela-
tionship’’  is  defined.  Merely  making  an  inquiry  of  a  business,  such  as  calling  and 
asking the price of an item or if they carry a particular brand will create an ‘‘estab-
lished business relationship’’ as that term is defined. Using that definition, who does 
not  have  an  ‘‘established  business  relationship’’  with  large  retailers  like  Wal-Mart 
or  Staples?  And  before  you  think  that  ‘‘legitimate’’  businesses  such  as  these  would 
not do junk faxing in violation of the TCPA, both of them have in recent years. 

In the last session of Congress, this problem was addressed with compromise lan-
guage that stated the ‘‘established business relationship’’ exemption only was avail-
able as a defense if the faxes were sent ‘‘based on’’ an existing ‘‘established business 
relationship.’’ In the example above, this would permit Joe’s faxes, but prohibit Bill’s 
faxes.  This  way,  faxes  sent  when  a  business  was  legitimately  trying  to  send  faxes 
to people it knew were its bona fide customers would qualify for the exemption, but 
faxes  ‘‘blasted’’  out  indiscriminately  would  not  be  permitted,  even  if  they  ‘‘acciden-
tally’’ were received by someone who had done business with the sender. 

I  share  the  same  goals  as  the  author  and  sponsors  of  this  bill:  we  all  want  to 

allow legitimate faxes and stop the junk faxes. 

I  also  share  the  same  approach  to  address  some  unintended  consequences  of  re-
cent FCC rule changes. We certainly do not want to turn back the clock on a whole-
sale basis. 

Many of the rule changes were clearly needed due to continued evasions of illegit-
imate telemarketers and fax advertisers. Reasonable businesses who send legitimate 
faxes do not want to create loopholes that will be exploited by other businesses that 
are  not  so  legitimate.  Those  businesses  who  want  to  make  legitimate  use  of  fax  as 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

25

a  communications  medium  are  certainly  in  favor  of  protecting  that  medium  from 
abuse. If they don’t their legitimate use of faxes gets tarred and feathered with the 
illegitimate uses. 

The current bill attempts to do two things:
• that express consent may be given in any manner; 
• that an EBR should be interpreted as providing express consent.
The first change is not controversial. While many people still believe that in some 
circumstances  requiring  written  permission  is  an  appropriate  safeguard,  there  is 
also a consensus that there are many situations where verbal permission is accept-
able.  However,  we  know  the  use  of  alleged  ‘‘verbal’’  permission  has  been  abused  by 
miscreants  in  the  past,  so  future  abuses  in  this  are  a  need  to  be  closely  watched. 
But  I  disagree  with  the  second  change  because  there  never  has  been  an  EBR 
for  fax  advertisements,  not  legally  and  not  in  reality.  I  have  reviewed  literally 
hundreds  of  TCPA  cases,  particularly  those  reported  by  the  TCPA  slip  service 
TCPALaw.com,  and  I  have  not  located  a  single  court  decision  where  the  court 
agreed with the FCC’s original interpretation. 
Adding an EBR Would Change the Status Quo, Not Restore It 

Therefore,  restoring  what  was  never  there  in  the  first  place,  is  not  restoring  the 
status quo. It is changing the status quo!!! In this particular case, it creates a large 
number  of  very  bad,  unintended  consequences  that  I’ve  documented  in  my  written 
materials. 

Legitimate fax advertising is sending what someone requested to be sent to them, 
and sending it to them at the phone number they have provided to you. It does not 
include ‘‘mining’’ for fax numbers or sending a fax to any indiscriminate fax number 
you  can  buy  or  find.  It  does  not  include  sending  5  pages  of  ads  for  life  insurance 
to someone who merely asked for a quote on car insurance and nothing else. It does 
not  mean  giving  carte  blanche  to  any  business  you  have  made  an  inquiry  to,  for 
them to send you junk mail that you have to pay for. 
Changing  the  Definitions  of  the  Terms  Solves  the  Problem  Without

Unintended Consequences 

The  right  way  to  restore  balance  and  permit  legitimate  fax  advertisements  with-
out  burdening  legitimate  senders,  is  simple:  just  replace  Section  2a  of  this  bill  so 
that  instead  of  creating  a  new  Established  Business  Relationship  (EBR)  exemption 
we simply redefine the meaning of ‘‘unsolicited advertisement’’ so that all legitimate 
faxed communications are exempted from regulation. 

That is easy:

The  term  ‘’unsolicited  advertisement’’  means  any  material  advertising  the  com-
mercial  availability  or  quality  of  any  property,  goods,  or  services,  but  does  not 
include  material  which  is:  (a)  expressly  requested,  in  writing  or  otherwise,  by 
the  recipient;  and  (b)  transmitted  to  a  telephone  number  voluntarily  provided 
to the sender by the recipient.

Other Improvements 

There is one simple improvement to the law that affects only companies that send 

faxes for others (such as Vision Lab, Protus IP Solutions, etc.):

Require that these professional ‘‘fax broadcasting’’ companies ALWAYS identify 
themselves  on  the  fax  REGARDLESS  of  whether  they  have  a  high  level  of  in-
volvement or not in the sending of the fax.

Currently,  they  are  only  required  to  do  this  if  they  have  a  ‘‘high  level  of  involve-
ment’’  in  the  transmission.  Of  course,  all  the  illegal  broadcasters  I  know  of  claim 
in  court  they  do  not  have  a  high  level  of  involvement.  This  makes  suing  the  illegal 
junk  fax  broadcaster  difficult  since  it  is  virtually  impossible  to  tell  where  the  fax 
was sent from. 
Conclusion 

Junk  faxes  are  a  major  problem  for  businesses  and  consumers.  Everyone  hates 

junk faxes. 

The  FCC  rulemaking  has  caused  a  great  deal  of  consternation  in  the  business 

community. We all agree that we need to turn the clock back. 

I’d  urge  this  Committee  not  to  overreact  to  the  problem  by  creating  a  new  EBR 

exemption which would generate a host of new, unanticipated problems. 

I’d  encourage  each  and  every  one  of  you  to  poll  your  constituents  and  ask  them 
how  many  businesses  that  they  would  like  to  receive  unsolicited  advertisements 
from  via  fax.  I’ve  done  it  and  the  answer  is  the  same  for  consumers,  big  business, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

26

and  small  business:  none  want  advertisements  from  businesses  they  do  business 
with unless they expressly ask for it. That is consistent with the FCC findings and 
precisely why the FCC attempted to strengthen the junk fax protections. 

The good news is that there is a simple solution: clarify the definition of an unso-
licited  advertisement.  This  will  keep  the  junk  faxes  at  bay  while  permitting  legiti-
mate business communication. 

I  hope  that  you  will  adopt  this  approach.  It’s  the  right  thing  to  do  as  it  benefits 
both  senders  and  recipients  without  the  danger  of  imposing  new  burdens  and  new 
legal liabilities. 

Thank you and I would be delighted to take any questions you have.

Senator SMITH. Thank you very much, Steve. 
Let  me  indicate,  they’re  barely  going  to  hold  this  vote  open  for 
Senator  Boxer  and  myself.  But,  Steve,  my  understanding  of  the 
law—and  I  want  to  do  this  right,  but—that  it’s  already  prohibited 
by  law  to  send  all  the  things  we’re  talking  about.  I  still  get  them. 
They’re  unlawful.  I’ve  got  to  take  action,  I  guess,  to  stop  them.  I 
worry about the verbal consent, whether it will work for companies, 
that they’ll want a legal defense to claims against them. And I be-
lieve  our  bill  allows  for  an  opt-out  provision  that  is,  in  fact,  new. 
So I just want to put that on the record. 

And, Senator Boxer, if you have a comment or a question——
Senator  BOXER.  Yes,  and  I  know  we  are  rushing  through  this, 
but I think the importance was to hear from the three of you, and 
I just want to thank the three of you very much. 

Senator SMITH. I join in those thanks. 
Senator BOXER. Yes, because you all presented the best case. And 
so,  I  want  to  sum  up  the  way  I  feel  about  this.  And  since  we’re 
marking up this bill tomorrow, it’s tough as we have to work quick-
ly. 

But, Mr. Kirsch, my understanding is, if I were to ask you today, 

What does your business do? 

and also eliminating spam. 

Mr.  KIRSCH.  We  make  software  for  speeding  up  Internet  access 

Senator  BOXER.  OK.  I  think,  under  the  Smith  bill—and  I  have 
a lot of friends who are on it—we now have a business relationship. 

Mr. KIRSCH. That’s——
Senator BOXER. Is that correct? 
Mr. KIRSCH.—that’s correct, Senator. 
Senator  BOXER.  So  now  you  have  the  right  to  go  to  the  Hill,  to 
all  the  offices  in  the  Hill,  and  get  all  of  our  fax  numbers,  and  fax 
us. 

Mr.  KIRSCH.  Well,  actually,  Senator,  it  goes  beyond  that.  You’ve 
just  given—thank  you  very  much  for  asking  me  that  question,  be-
cause you’ve just given me the right to send my advertising for any 
product—not  only  my  own  products,  but  for  someone  else’s  prod-
uct—to every single fax machine in the Federal Government. 

Senator BOXER. OK. 
Mr. KIRSCH. Until they opt out. 
Senator BOXER. Right, exactly. 
Mr. KIRSCH. But——
Senator BOXER. I understand. 
Mr. KIRSCH.—they’ll probably have to opt out one fax machine at 

a time. 

Senator BOXER. I understand. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

27

Mr.  KIRSCH.  Because  if  they  opt  out—if  they  just  send  me  a  list 
of  all  the  fax  machines,  and  say,  ‘‘Hey,  opt  me  out,’’  I’m  going  to 
take—you know, some—I wouldn’t do this, but someone is going to 
take  that  list  of  all  of  the  fax  machines  that  the  Federal  Govern-
ment has just given me——

Senator BOXER. And sell them. 
Mr. KIRSCH.—and sell it. 
Senator BOXER. Sure. 
Mr. KIRSCH. Sell it to a fax broadcaster, who will then add—you 

know, get into a conversation with you and——

Senator BOXER. Right. 
Mr. KIRSCH.—they’ll fax every machine——
Senator BOXER. Right. 
Mr. KIRSCH.—until each individual machine opts out. 
Senator  BOXER.  I  understand.  My  point  is  made.  This  bill,  just 
leans  too  far  in  the  other  direction.  I  don’t  like  what  the  FCC  did, 
and I want to say, as I did today—if I’m doing business with some-
one,  Mr.  Feeken,  you  or  Mr.  Bladine  or  Mr.  Kirsch,  and  you  say, 
‘‘Barbara,  I  think  if  I  faxed  you  something,  you’ll  get  a  better  pic-
ture of it,’’ and I say, ‘‘Absolutely fax it, fine,’’ and then I get it and 
I’m  a  happy  person.  I’ve  given  you  my  verbal  consent,  and  we’re 
done. And you make a quick note, ‘‘She gave a verbal consent,’’ and 
that’s the bottom line. 

I’ll even go a little further than that, if we have to. But the way 
this  bill  is  set  up—it  has  serious  unintended  consequence.  I  mean, 
Senator Smith wants to cure the problem of junk faxes, I just think 
the  consumer  groups  that  are  working  with  me  on  this  thing,  the 
people who drafted this bill missed the mark. And the scenario, Mr. 
Kirsch, that you laid out here is a nightmare scenario. And I don’t 
think  that  it’s  that  easy  to  opt  out.  I  get  these  faxes  sometimes, 
Gordon,  and  they  say,  ‘‘Call  1–800  yadda-dadda-dah  if  you  don’t 
want  any  more  faxes.’’  And  I  do  it,  and  I  can’t  get  anyone.  They 
say, ‘‘Do not call now.’’ And matter of fact, in your bill it says, ‘‘dur-
ing business hours.’’ It’s not like you’re requiring a 24-hour hotline. 
That  would  be  better.  So  I  think  there  are  ways  we  can  work  to-
gether. 

Now, the last point I’d make is, in your bill you say to the FCC—

Senator SMITH. FCC. 
Senator  BOXER.  FCC.  I’ve  got  FTC  on  the  brain,  with  oil  prices. 
You  say  to  the  FCC,  ‘‘You  have  18  months  to  establish  what  the 
business  relationship  is.’’  In  the  meantime,  if  I  did  business  with 
someone  40  years  ago,  that’s  an  established  business  relationship, 
under  the  way  the  bill  is  written  now.  So  people  who  did  business 
with  me  in  another  world,  still  will  be  able  to  fax  me.  So  I  think 
the FCC went too far, and I think we’ve got to rein them in. I think 
a  verbal  consent  would  be  my  preference,  because  I  think  what 
Steve  Kirsch  points  out  is  the  current  situation  has  been  working 
OK.  You,  yourself,  said  that,  Mr.  Feeken.  You,  yourself,  were  nod-
ding.  It  works  OK.  What  do  we  need  this  bill  for,  that  goes  so  far 
the  other  way  that  we’re  going  to  take  2  billion  faxes  and  turn 
them into 4 billion faxes? 

So we’ve got a lot of work to do, because, unfortunately, we have 
the  mark-up  tomorrow.  It’s  only  because  Senator  Smith  is  such  a 

FTC ? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

28

and——

dear  friend  and  a  fair  person  that  we  got  a  chance  to  hear  from 
you today. 

Our  time  is  short.  I  don’t  have  any  other  questions.  I  just  think 
there  are  a  few  things  we  could  fix.  I  hope,  maybe  over  the  course 
of these next 12 hours——
Senator SMITH. Well——
Senator  BOXER.—you  and  I  can  come  to  some  agreements  here 

Senator  SMITH.—we’ve  got  some  time,  and,  obviously,  even  after 

tomorrow on the floor——
Senator BOXER. Right. 
Senator SMITH.—we can keep working this——
Senator BOXER. Good. 
Senator SMITH. We want to get it right. It’s a bedeviling problem 
to manage all of the consequences. When we grab here, it blows up 
over  there.  But  we’ll  keep  trying,  because  we  really  do  need,  and 
we will get ahead of the expiration of this FCC deadline. 

So,  thank  you  all.  We  apologize  for  the  truncated  schedule,  but, 
unfortunately,  the  Majority  Leader  does  not  schedule  the  Senate 
business around this Subcommittee. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator BOXER. Which is not fair. 
Senator  SMITH.  Which  is  not  right.  But,  anyway,  that’s  what  it 

is. 

ciate it. 

Senator  BOXER.  But  I  think  this  hearing  did  what  it  had  to  do. 
Senator SMITH. It did. 
Senator BOXER. We got out every point of view, and we so appre-

Senator  SMITH.  You’ve  contributed  to  the  public  record.  We’re 

grateful to each of you. We’re adjourned. 

[Whereupon, at 3:25 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.]

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:14 Feb 21, 2006 Jkt 025874 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25874.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

